Louisiana, session 2026, SB524.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Page 1 of 83
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-2719 ENGROSSED
SB NO. 524
Section 1. Subpart A-4 of Part III of Chapter 1 of Title 17 of the Louisiana Revised
Statutes of 1950, comprised of R.S. 17:189.1 through 189.20, is hereby enacted to read as
follows:
SUBPART A-4. LOUISIANA JUMP START MODERNIZATION ACT
189.1. Legislative findings; purpose
A. Legislative findings.
The legislature hereby finds and declares all of the following:
(1) Career and technical education is foundational to Louisiana's
workforce development, economic competitiveness, and educational goals, and
a coherent, high-quality career and technical education system is essential to
connecting Louisiana students to priority careers and to meeting regional and
statewide employer demand.
(2) Louisiana's long-term economic competitiveness depends on a system
that is responsive to labor market demand, supported by cross-agency
coordination, and grounded in transparent outcome data.
(3) Louisiana's students, families, and employers are best served by a
Jump Start program grounded in strong governance accountability, rigorous
program quality standards, public data reporting, and durable industry
alignment mechanisms, and this Act establishes the statutory framework
necessary to ensure the program delivers lasting, measurable value across
administrations and budget cycles.
B. Statement of purpose.
The purposes of this Subpart are to accomplish all of the following:
(1) To establish a coherent, high-quality K-12 Jump Start pathway
system organized around a clearly defined framework.
(2) To strengthen the governance, quality, and accountability of the
Jump Start program by creating a collaborative overseen and facilitated by the
Louisiana Workforce Investment Council with defined composition and
authority; establishing cross-agency coordination among the state Department
Page 2 of 83
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-2719 ENGROSSED
SB NO. 524
of Education, Louisiana Works, the Board of Regents, and the Louisiana
Community and Technical Colleges; ensuring that authorized Jump Start
pathways lead to viable, high-wage, high-demand occupations; and establishing
statute criteria on transparent public data reporting.
(3) To ensure that every Louisiana student has access to, and can
complete, rigorous Jump Start pathways by establishing differentiated
provisions, guaranteeing postsecondary articulation credit opportunities for
Career Diploma completers, and providing that no student's geographic
location shall determine the quality or availability of Jump Start pathways
available to that student.
C. Program designation; short title.
(1) The career and technical education program established by this
Subpart shall be known and may be cited as the "Louisiana Jump Start Career
Diploma Program".
(2) This Subpart may be cited as the "Louisiana Jump Start
Modernization Act".
(3) Nothing in this Subpart shall be construed to alter the program
designation established in Paragraph (1) of this Subsection, or to limit the
authority of the State Board of Elementary and Secondary Education to develop
program materials, adopt administrative rules, and communicate with the
public regarding this Subpart using the program name established by this
Subsection. Any rules, bulletins, or guidance documents adopted by the State
Board of Elementary and Secondary Education pursuant to this Subpart shall
reference the program by its statutory designation.
§189.2. Definitions
The definitions set forth in this Section shall govern the interpretation
of every Section of this Subpart. As used in this Subpart, the following terms
shall have the following meanings:
(1) "Career and technical education" or "CTE". This term shall be
Page 3 of 83
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-2719 ENGROSSED
SB NO. 524
interpreted consistent with, and shall not be construed more narrowly than, the
definition established in the Carl D. Perkins Career and Technical Education
Act of 2006, as amended, 20 U.S.C. 2302(5).
(2) "Career Diploma". A secondary school diploma issued by the State
Board of Elementary and Secondary Education to a student who has
successfully completed all requirements of an approved Louisiana Jump Start
career pathway under this Subpart. A Career Diploma shall be recognized by
all Louisiana public postsecondary education institutions.
(3) "Career coach" or "qualified career coach". A person who is not a
licensed school counselor but who is authorized by a public school governing
authority to provide individualized student career planning and advising
services pursuant to R.S. 17:2926, the requirements of this Subpart, and who
meets the qualifications pursuant to R.S. 17:189.8. Nothing in this definition
shall be construed to authorize a career coach to perform duties reserved by law
to a licensed school counselor, except as specifically provided by this Subpart.
(4) "CTE concentrator". A secondary student who has completed at least
two credits in a single approved Jump Start pathway.
(5) "CTE completer". A secondary student who has satisfied all
requirements of an approved Jump Start pathway under this Subpart,
including the nine-credit Jump Start course sequence established in R.S.
17:189.10, and who has earned at least one credential as required for Career
Diploma completion. The term includes both students who earn a Career
Diploma and students who complete all pathway requirements but do not elect
to receive a Career Diploma.
(6) "Career major program". A structured sequence of academic core
and career and technical education courses constituting the curriculum of an
authorized Jump Start pathway through which a student satisfies the
requirements for a Louisiana Career Diploma.
(7) "Enhanced wage record" or "EWR". A quarterly wage record
Page 4 of 83
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-2719 ENGROSSED
SB NO. 524
submitted by an employer to Louisiana Works that may include, in addition to
the elements required for standard unemployment insurance wage reporting
under Title 23 of the Louisiana Revised Statutes of 1950, the following job-level
data elements for each employee during the reporting period:
(a) Occupation code consistent with the Standard Occupational
Classification (SOC) system.
(b) Total hours worked.
(c) Primary work location.
(d) Hourly wage equivalent.
(e) Job start and end dates.
Enhanced wage record data shall serve as the primary wage and
employment outcome tracking mechanism for career and technical education
pathway completers pursuant to R.S. 17:189.18.
(8) "Individual Career and Academic Plan" or "ICAP". Longitudinal
career development and academic planning document required for each student
under R.S 17:189.7 that identifies the student's career interests, academic
strengths, and preliminary career pathway goals. An ICAP shall be initiated no
later than the beginning of grade seven, reviewed, and updated annually
through grade twelve. The ICAP shall serve as the primary planning instrument
connecting the K-12 career awareness and exploration framework to approved
Jump Start pathway selection and enrollment, as established in R.S. 17:189.7.
(9) "Individual Graduation Plan" or "IGP". The individualized
graduation plan required for each student pursuant to R.S. 17:2925 that sets
forth the student's selected course of study, chosen diploma pathway, and
postsecondary goals. The IGP shall be aligned with the student's Individual
Career and Academic Plan as provided in R.S. 17:189.7, shall be developed,
reviewed annually, and revised with the assistance of a school counselor or
career coach as provided in R.S. 17:2925, and shall, for a student pursuing a
Career Diploma under this Subpart, identify the approved Jump Start pathway
Page 5 of 83
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-2719 ENGROSSED
SB NO. 524
selected by the student.
(10) "Individualized Education Program" or "IEP". Written educational
plan required for each eligible student with a disability under the Individuals
with Disabilities Education Act (IDEA), 20 U.S.C. 1400 et seq., and as the term
applies to students with exceptionalities as defined in R.S. 17:1942. For purposes
of this Subpart, an IEP shall be coordinated with the student's Individual
Career and Academic Plan and Individual Graduation Plan to ensure
meaningful access to appropriate career and technical education pathways
consistent with the student's educational goals and all applicable requirements
under IDEA, the Family Educational Rights and Privacy Act, 20 U.S.C. 1232g,
and R.S. 44:1 et seq.
(11) "Industry credential". An independent, third-party credential that:
(a) Reflects a specific set of competencies related to a particular industry
sector or occupation.
(b) Is recognized and accepted by employers in the relevant labor market
as evidence of workplace readiness.
(c) Is portable across employers and geographic areas.
(d) Provides a valid and reliable measure of an individual's technical
knowledge and skills.
(e) Takes the form of a diploma, certification, certificate, or occupational
license. For purposes of this Subpart, a credential must be approved by the
Louisiana Workforce Investment Council pursuant to R.S. 23:206.
(12) "K-12 Jump Start pathway" or "Jump Start pathway". An
approved, structured sequence of career and technical education courses, work-
based learning experiences, and credentials organized around a defined career
field within a recognized career cluster and authorized by the State Board of
Elementary and Secondary Education following a recommendation by the
collaborative. The term includes both statewide pathways and regional
pathways as defined in this Section, and shall not be construed to include any
Page 6 of 83
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-2719 ENGROSSED
SB NO. 524
sequence of courses that does not satisfy the minimum standards pursuant to
R.S. 17:189.10.
(13) "Louisiana Community and Technical Colleges" or "LCTC". The
public postsecondary education system charged with the administration,
management, and supervision of the community colleges, technical colleges, and
affiliated institutions within the state.
(14) "Louisiana Workforce Investment Council" or "WIC". The state
workforce development board created within Louisiana Works pursuant to R.S.
23:2042 et seq., and placed within the executive office of the secretary of
Louisiana Works. The council serves as the state's workforce development
board for the purposes of meeting the requirements of the federal Workforce
Innovation and Opportunity Act of 2014, 29 U.S.C. 3101 et seq., and is
responsible for directing the Occupational Forecasting Conference in
determining official information necessary for workforce development planning
and budgeting.
(15) "Louisiana Works" or "LA Works". State agency established
pursuant to R.S. 23:2061 et seq., that administers Louisiana's workforce
development programs, unemployment insurance system, and labor market
information services. Louisiana Works shall serve as a data and coordination
partner for career and technical education outcome tracking and industry
alignment review pursuant to R.S. 17:189.18.
(16) "Local education agency". A public board of education or other
public authority legally constituted within Louisiana for the administrative
control and direction of, or to perform a service function for, public elementary
or secondary schools in a city, parish, or other local public school district,
consistent with the definition established in R.S. 17:1942. The term includes
each city, parish, and other local public school board responsible for
implementing a career and technical education program under this Subpart,
and each local school system participating in a regional team pursuant to R.S.
Page 7 of 83
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-2719 ENGROSSED
SB NO. 524
17:189.9.
(17) "Priority occupation". An occupation that has been formally
designated by the Workforce Investment Council based on current and
projected regional or statewide labor market demand data from Louisiana
Works, the Bureau of Labor Statistics, as a priority occupation for career and
technical education pathway development and public investment. A priority
occupation designation is distinct from the viable occupation standard in
Paragraph (22) of this Section in that it reflects an affirmative policy
designation for pathway development, not the minimum threshold for pathway
authorization.
(18) "Regional pathway". A Jump Start pathway developed by a
regional team and authorized by the State Board of Elementary and Secondary
Education for delivery within a defined geographic region of the state, which
may be tailored to address regionally specific labor market demands, local
industry partner capacity, and regional workforce priorities within that region.
A regional pathway shall satisfy all minimum pathway authorization
requirements pursuant to R.S. 17:189.13 and shall adhere to the same academic
requirements as statewide pathways to enable students to continue
postsecondary education following high school graduation.
(19) "Regional team". A multi-agency, multi-sector body under the
leadership of LCTC, aligning state and regional workforce priorities with
Louisiana Works' strategic goals and federal requirements of the Carl D.
Perkins Career and Technical Education Act of 2006. Regional teams will
include representatives of public community and technical colleges, local
education agencies, and business and industry.
(20) "Rural local education agency" or "rural LEA". A local education
agency that meets the population density, school enrollment, and geographic
criteria established in R.S. 17:189.14 and that is therefore eligible for:
(a) Differentiated pathway authorization thresholds that account for
Page 8 of 83
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-2719 ENGROSSED
SB NO. 524
limited local industry partner pools and small student enrollment sizes.
(b) Inter-district consortium pathway authorization allowing multiple
rural LEAs to jointly develop and deliver a single pathway.
(c) Rural-specific program delivery provisions pursuant to R.S.
17:189.14.
(21) "Statewide pathway". A Jump Start pathway authorized by the
State Board of Elementary and Secondary Education for delivery statewide,
anchored to one or more credentials approved by the Louisiana Workforce
Investment Council pursuant to R.S. 23:2065, and meeting all pathway
authorization requirements pursuant to R.S. 17:189.13.
(22) "Viable occupation". An occupation that meets the minimum wage
and demand standards established by Louisiana Works. The viable occupation
standard constitutes the minimum authorization floor for pathway approval
and is distinct from a priority occupation designation under Paragraph (17) of
this Section.
(23) "Work-based learning". A structured, supervised learning activity
that integrates classroom instruction with employer-directed workplace
experience through progressively intensive levels of engagement, organized as
a tiered quality continuum as established in R.S. 17:189.11. The term includes
both school-supervised and employer-supervised placements as categorized in
R.S. 17:189.11.
§189.3. Collaborative board; governance; duties
A. Governance; authority.
(1) There is hereby created a multi-agency collaborative, sometimes
hereinafter referred to as the "collaborative". The Louisiana Workforce
Investment Council within Louisiana Works shall oversee and facilitate the
multi-agency collaborative. The collaborative shall include the following
members:
(a) The secretary of Louisiana Works, or his designee.
Page 9 of 83
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-2719 ENGROSSED
SB NO. 524
(b) The state Superintendent of Education, or his designee.
(c) The commissioner of Higher Education, or his designee.
(d) The president of the Louisiana Community and Technical Colleges,
or his designee.
(e) The chairman of the Workforce Investment Council, or his designee.
(2) Representatives of industry sectors designated as priority industries
by the Louisiana Workforce Investment Council and presidents or senior staff
representing statewide business or industry associations headquartered in
Louisiana shall also serve as members of the established collaborative.
(a) No more than seven industry members shall serve at any one time,
and no more than two of the seven industry members shall represent the same
priority industry sector. Each such member shall be a current owner, officer,
or senior employee of a Louisiana domiciled business.
(b) No more than three presidents or senior staff representing statewide
business or industry associations headquartered in Louisiana shall serve at any
one time.
(c) The industry representative members described in this Paragraph
shall be appointed by the chairman of the Louisiana Workforce Investment
Council.
(3) The chairman of the Louisiana Workforce Investment Council shall
determine the operational placement of the collaborative within Louisiana
Works in consultation with the secretary of Louisiana Works.
(4) Members of the collaborative shall serve as voting members and shall
adhere to all meeting and quorum requirements as established by the Louisiana
Workforce Investment Council.
(5) The collaborative shall be subject to the Open Meetings Law,
pursuant to R.S. 42:11 et seq., the Public Records Law, pursuant to R.S. 44:1
et seq., and the Code of Governmental Ethics, pursuant to R.S. 42:1101 et seq.,
as applicable to its operations.
Page 10 of 83
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-2719 ENGROSSED
SB NO. 524
(6) The collaborative shall elect a chairman by majority vote of its
members. The chairman shall be selected from the industry representative
members serving pursuant to Paragraph (2) of this Subsection.
B. Meeting requirements; frequency; public access; record-keeping.
(1) The collaborative shall meet not fewer than four times per calendar
year.
(2) All meetings of the collaborative shall be open to the public and
conducted in compliance with the Open Meeting Law pursuant to R.S. 42:11 et
seq. Written notice of each regular meeting shall be provided not fewer than
five business days in advance through the publicly accessible website
maintained pursuant to Paragraph (3) of this Subsection. Emergency meetings
shall be convened only in compliance with R.S. 42:19.
(3) All records, including meeting minutes, official correspondence,
written recommendations, and agency responses, shall constitute public records
subject to R.S. 44:1 et seq.
C. Duties and responsibilities.
The collaborative shall have the following duties and responsibilities:
(1) To review each of the following categories of proposed decisions and
to issue written recommendations to the State Board of Elementary and
Secondary Education thereon, prior to and as a condition of board action:
(a) Authorization of any new statewide or regional Jump Start pathway
pursuant to R.S. 17:189.9.
(b) Significant modification of any currently authorized statewide or
regional pathway, defined as any change to a pathway identified credential,
required Jump Start career and technical education course sequence, or the
work-based learning tier requirement.
(c) Sunset, discontinuation, or deauthorization of any currently
authorized statewide or regional pathway pursuant to R.S. 17:189.13.
(d) Reclassification of any credential from one tier to another under the
Page 11 of 83
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-2719 ENGROSSED
SB NO. 524
approved credential tier list established pursuant to R.S. 17:189.12, including
elevation to a higher tier, demotion to a lower tier, or removal from the
approved list.
(e) Adoption or significant revision of the statewide standards applicable
to all Jump Start pathway designation proposals under R.S. 17:189.9.
(2) To establish and maintain an inter-agency shared performance
framework for the Louisiana Jump Start Career Diploma Program. The shared
performance framework shall be binding on each member agency for purposes
of annual reporting and shall be reviewed and updated by the collaborative not
less than every two years. The framework shall include at minimum:
(a) Student Jump Start pathway completion rates, disaggregated by race,
income, disability status, and geographic region.
(b) Credential attainment rates by pathway, disaggregated by credential
tier established under R.S. 17:189.12.
(c) Post-graduation employment rates and median wages for Career
Diploma holders, measured at one year and three years after graduation using
enhanced wage record data as defined in R.S. 17:189.2.
(d) Postsecondary continuation rates for Career Diploma holders at
Louisiana public postsecondary institutions.
(e) Advanced work-based learning participation rates, defined as Level
3 or above under R.S. 17:189.11.
(f) Pathway-level return on investment metrics pursuant to R.S.
17:3138.13.
(3) To implement and maintain the shared performance framework
established pursuant to Paragraph (2) of this Subsection in a manner that is
consistent and coordinated with any existing or future legislation addressing K-
12, postsecondary, or workforce data collection, performance metrics,
accountability reporting, or data transparency. In conducting each biennial
review and update of the shared performance framework under Paragraph (2)
Page 12 of 83
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-2719 ENGROSSED
SB NO. 524
of this Subsection, the collaborative shall assess the framework's consistency
with any such legislation enacted or amended since the prior review and shall
revise the framework as necessary to avoid duplication, ensure compatibility,
and leverage data resources and reporting obligations established by such
legislation.
(4) To review and issue written recommendations to the State Board of
Elementary and Secondary Education on the designation, reclassification,
elevation, demotion, or removal of credentials from the approved credential tier
list pursuant to R.S. 17:189.12.
(5) To prepare and publish an annual performance report on Jump Start
program outcomes, submitted to the legislature and posted publicly not later
than December first of each year. The annual report shall present data
measured under the shared performance framework established pursuant to
Paragraph (2) of this Subsection.
(6) To establish an inter-agency Memorandum of Understanding (MOU)
specifying each member agency's obligations under the shared performance
framework, annual reporting deadline, and data sharing responsibilities
pursuant to R.S. 17:189.18.
D. Collaborative authority; scope and limits.
(1) The authority of the collaborative is limited to the powers expressly
granted by this Subpart. No provision of this Subpart shall be construed to
expand the collaborative's authority beyond those expressly granted powers,
nor shall this Subpart be construed to limit the rulemaking authority of the
State Board of Elementary and Secondary Education under R.S. 17:7, except
as expressly provided in Subsection F of this Section.
(2) The collaborative's written recommendations issued pursuant to
Subsection F of this Section are advisory in legal character; they create a
procedural prerequisite to The State Board of Elementary and Secondary
Education action on specified decisions and impose transparency obligations
Page 13 of 83
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-2719 ENGROSSED
SB NO. 524
when The State Board of Elementary and Secondary Education departs from
such recommendations, but they do not in themselves constitute final agency
action and shall not be subject to judicial review as final orders.
E. State Board of Elementary and Secondary Education-collaborative
jurisdictional boundary; decisionmaking hierarchy
(1) Notwithstanding any other provision of this Subpart or of R.S. 17:7,
the State Board of Elementary and Secondary Education shall not take formal
action on any of the following categories of decisions without first receiving a
written recommendation from the collaborative pursuant to Paragraph (2) of
this Subsection:
(a) Authorization of any new statewide or regional Jump Start pathway
pursuant to R.S. 17:189.9.
(b) Significant modification of any currently authorized statewide or
regional Jump Start pathway, defined for purposes of this Subsection as any
change to one or more of the following elements of an authorized pathway:
(i) Pathway identified credential or credential tier.
(ii) The required career and technical education course sequence.
(iii) Work-based learning tier requirement.
(c) Sunset, discontinuation, or deauthorization of any currently
authorized statewide or regional pathway pursuant to R.S. 17:189.13.
(d) Reclassification of any credential from one tier to another under the
approved credential tier list established pursuant to R.S. 17:189.12, including
elevation to a higher tier, demotion to a lower tier, or removal from the
approved list.
(e) Adoption or significant revision of the statewide standards applicable
to all Jump Start pathway authorization proposals under R.S. 17:189.9.
(2) When The State Board of Elementary and Secondary Education
proposes to take action on a decision enumerated in Paragraph (1) of this
Subsection, the following process shall govern:
Page 14 of 83
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-2719 ENGROSSED
SB NO. 524
(a) The state Department of Education shall transmit to the collaborative
a written notice of the proposed decision, a complete description of the proposed
action, and all supporting documentation material to the decision.
(b) The collaborative shall issue its written recommendation. The written
recommendation shall include:
(i) The collaborative's specific recommendation, stated as a
recommendation to approve, approve with conditions, deny, or defer the
proposed action.
(ii) The collaborative's written findings supporting the recommendation.
(c) If the collaborative fails to issue a written recommendation, the State
Board of Elementary and Secondary Education may proceed with the proposed
action without a recommendation. The State Board of Elementary and
Secondary Education action record shall document that the collaborative did
not issue a timely recommendation.
(3) If the State Board of Elementary and Secondary Education takes
action contrary to a written recommendation issued by the collaborative
pursuant to Paragraph (2) of this Subsection, the following requirements shall
apply:
(a) The State Board of Elementary and Secondary Education shall adopt,
at the same meeting at which it takes the action that departs from the
collaborative's recommendation, written findings stating specifically:
(i) The collaborative's recommendation and the basis stated in its written
findings.
(ii) The reasons for departing from the collaborative's recommendation.
(iii) The specific factual and policy basis for the action.
(4) Nothing in this Subsection shall be construed to require the State
Board of Elementary and Secondary Education to follow a recommendation or
to limit the Board's final rulemaking authority under R.S. 17:7. The
collaborative recommendation process required by this Subsection is a
Page 15 of 83
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-2719 ENGROSSED
SB NO. 524
procedural prerequisite to final action by the State Board of Elementary and
Secondary Education on the enumerated decision categories, not a limitation on
the State Board of Elementary and Secondary Education's substantive
authority. Compliance with this Subsection does not itself constitute compliance
with any other requirement of law applicable to the State Board of Elementary
and Secondary Education's rulemaking or decisionmaking processes.
F. Funding authorization; administrative support.
(1) There are hereby authorized to be appropriated from the state
general fund such sums as may be necessary for the collaborative to carry out
its duties and responsibilities under this Subpart. The collaborative's funding
authorization shall be a continuing authorization subject to annual legislative
appropriation.
(2) Members of the collaborative shall serve without compensation. Each
industry and association representative shall be entitled to reimbursement for
necessary and reasonable travel expenses and per diem incurred in the
performance of official collaborative duties, at the rates established by law for
state officials and employees.
(3) The Louisiana Workforce Investment Council within Louisiana
Works shall provide administrative and staff support to the collaborative,
including staff resources necessary for maintaining minutes and records,
coordinating meeting logistics, operating the publicly accessible website on
which collaborative documents are posted, and preparing reports as required
under this Subpart.
§189.4. Industry sector prioritization; priority occupation determination
A. Statewide priority industry list; establishment and maintenance;
priority industry alignment process.
(1) The collaborative shall establish, maintain, and update a Statewide
Priority Industry List, sometimes hereinafter referred to as the "Priority List",
identifying the industry sectors in Louisiana designated as priority industries
Page 16 of 83
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-2719 ENGROSSED
SB NO. 524
for purposes of K-12 Jump Start pathway development and credential tier
classification pursuant to R.S. 17:189.12 in alignment with the priorities of the
Board of Regents, Louisiana Community and Technical Colleges, and the
Workforce Investment Council's statewide strategic workforce plan. The
collaborative may identify an established Louisiana council, committee, or
agency to support the development and maintenance of the Priority List.
(2) An initial Priority List shall be acknowledged by the collaborative not
later than one hundred eighty calendar days after the effective date of this
Subpart, following the data-driven process specified in Subsection B of this
Section, and shall be published on the publicly accessible website maintained
pursuant to R.S. 17:189.3.
(3) No Jump Start pathway shall be authorized under this Subpart unless
the pathway is aligned to an occupation within an industry sector included on
the Priority List or, for regional pathways, the applicable Regional Priority
Industry List established under Subsection F of this Section. Inclusion of an
industry sector on the Priority List shall not constitute pathway authorization;
all pathways must separately satisfy the requirements of R.S. 17:189.9.
(4) All collaborative determinations under this Section shall be based on
documented analysis of current, publicly available labor market and wage data.
B. Biennial industry-level priority review; distinct from five-year
pathway cycle.
(1) The collaborative shall conduct a comprehensive review of the
Statewide Priority Industry List established under Subsection A of this Section
not less frequently than once every two years. The first Biennial Priority Review
shall be completed not later than twenty-four months after the initial Priority
List is established pursuant to Paragraph (A)(2) of this Section. Subsequent
Biennial Priority Reviews shall be completed not later than twenty-four months
after the completion of the preceding review.
(2) The Biennial Priority Review is a distinct and independent process
Page 17 of 83
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-2719 ENGROSSED
SB NO. 524
from the five-year pathway reauthorization cycle established in R.S. 17:189.13.
Neither process satisfies nor substitutes for the other.
(3) Following each Biennial Priority Review, the collaborative shall:
(a) Issue a written Priority Review Report summarizing all findings, data
sources, and determinations.
(b) Post the Priority Review Report on the publicly accessible website
maintained pursuant to R.S. 17:189.3, not later than thirty calendar days
following the meeting at which the review was completed.
(c) Notify each local education agency and each regional team of any
additions to, removals from, or modifications to the Priority List, including the
effective date of such changes and the data basis for each change.
(d) Transmit the Priority Review Report to the chair of the House
Committee on Education and the chair of the Senate Committee on Education,
consistent with the collaborative's annual reporting obligations under R.S.
17:189.3.
(4) Where the collaborative's Biennial Priority Review results in the
removal of an industry sector from the Priority List, Jump Start pathways
aligned to occupations within that sector that were authorized before the
removal shall not be automatically deauthorized. Such pathways shall remain
authorized until their next scheduled reauthorization review under R.S.
17:189.13.
C. Regional priority industry lists.
(1) In addition to the Statewide Priority Industry List established under
Subsection A of this Section, each region and regional team, established
pursuant to R.S. 17:189.9 shall develop a Regional Priority Industry List,
sometimes hereinafter referred to as the "Regional List", identifying the
priority industry sectors of the region served by that regional team. Regional
Lists shall reflect the specific labor market conditions of the relevant region.
(2) Regional Lists shall be developed and approved through the following
Page 18 of 83
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-2719 ENGROSSED
SB NO. 524
process:
(a) Each regional team shall develop a proposed Regional List, drawing
on the regional labor market data.
(b) The regional team shall submit its proposed Regional List to the
collaborative, accompanied by:
(i) All supporting regional labor market data.
(ii) Where sectors not on the Statewide Priority Industry List are
proposed for regional inclusion, employer demand documentation.
(c) The collaborative shall review each proposed Regional List and shall
approve, approve with modifications, or return the proposed list to the regional
team with written findings. A Regional List approved under this Subparagraph
shall take effect upon collaborative approval and shall be published on the
publicly accessible website maintained pursuant to R.S. 17:189.3 (H)(3).
(3) A Regional List shall be updated by its regional team within six
months following the collaborative's completion of each Biennial Priority
Review. A regional team may propose an interim update to its Regional List at
any time, prior to the conclusion of a Biennial Priority Review cycle, if
documented changes in regional labor market conditions published by
Louisiana Works or reported by local and regional workforce development
boards warrant a revision.
(4) No Jump Start pathway shall be authorized under this Subpart for
an occupation within an industry sector that is not included on an applicable
Regional Priority Industry List for the workforce development region in which
the pathway would be delivered. Alignment with a Regional List is a necessary
but not sufficient condition for regional pathway authorization; all regional
pathways must separately satisfy the full requirements of R.S. 17:189.9.
§189.5. Louisiana Career Diploma; equal status
A. Career Diploma.
(1) There is hereby established within the Louisiana Jump Start Career
Page 19 of 83
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-2719 ENGROSSED
SB NO. 524
Diploma Program a credential to be known as the "Louisiana Career Diploma",
which shall be issued by the State Board of Elementary and Secondary
Education to any student who successfully completes all requirements of an
approved Louisiana Jump Start pathway under this Subpart, as defined in R.S.
17:189.2(12).
(2) All provisions of this Subpart shall be administered to support and
accurately measure Career Diploma attainment.
(3) The state Board of Elementary and Secondary Education shall
establish and maintain, in administrative rules adopted consistent with R.S.
17:7, all requirements for the award of the Louisiana Career Diploma,
consistent with the standards established in this Subpart.
B. Standard diploma.
(1) A Louisiana Career Diploma issued pursuant to this Subpart shall be
a standard diploma for all purposes under Louisiana law.
(2) For purposes of Paragraph (1) of this Subsection, "all purposes under
Louisiana law" includes but is not limited to:
(a) Employment by state agencies, state departments, political
subdivisions, and other state entities that require a high school diploma or
equivalent as a minimum qualification.
(b) Eligibility for admission to Louisiana public postsecondary education
institutions under the circumstances provided in Subsection C of this Section.
(c) Eligibility for state financial aid programs that require a high school
diploma as a qualifying criterion.
C. Postsecondary nonrestriction.
(1) A Career Diploma issued to a student pursuant to this Subpart shall
not limit a graduate's right to pursue postsecondary education for which the
graduate is otherwise eligible.
(2) All Louisiana public postsecondary institutions shall recognize the
Louisiana Career Diploma as equivalent to a standard diploma.
Page 20 of 83
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-2719 ENGROSSED
SB NO. 524
(3) Nothing in this Subsection shall be construed to require any
postsecondary institution to admit a graduate who does not otherwise meet the
institution's published admissions standards.
(4) The Board of Regents shall, not later than one year after the effective
date of this Subpart and annually thereafter, certify to the legislature and to the
Louisiana Jump Start Collaborative that no Louisiana public postsecondary
institution under its jurisdiction has adopted or maintained a policy inconsistent
with Paragraph (2) of this Subsection.
§189.6. K-12 Jump Start pathway framework
A. Four-stage framework established.
(1) There is hereby established within the Louisiana Jump Start Career
Diploma Program a four-stage developmental framework for K-12 career and
technical education, to be known as the "Louisiana K-12 Jump Start Pathway
Framework", which shall constitute the organizing structure for all career
awareness, exploration, concentration, and completion activities within the
Jump Start program. The four stages of the framework are designated as Stage
I Career Awareness, grades kindergarten through six; Stage II Career
Exploration, grades seven through eight; Stage III Career Concentration,
grades nine through ten; and Stage IV Career Completion, grades eleven
through twelve, as further described in Subsections B through E of this Section.
(2) The purpose of the four-stage framework is to ensure that student
participation in the Louisiana Jump Start Career Diploma Program is the result
of a longitudinal, developmentally appropriate progression beginning in
elementary school. The State Board of Elementary and Secondary Education
shall incorporate the framework into all administrative rules and bulletins
governing the Jump Start program.
(3) All stage-level activities and requirements under this Section shall be
designed to support Louisiana's compliance with all applicable reporting and
performance obligations under the Carl D. Perkins Career and Technical
Page 21 of 83
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-2719 ENGROSSED
SB NO. 524
Education Act of 2006, as amended, 20 U.S.C. 2301 et seq.
(4) The Louisiana Jump Start Collaborative shall, in conducting the
shared performance framework review required under R.S. 17:189.3, include
in its assessment findings on stage-level implementation in the annual joint
performance report required under R.S. 17:189.3.
B. Stage I: Career awareness grades kindergarten through six.
(1) Stage I shall encompass grades kindergarten through six and shall be
designed to build foundational career awareness in students through age-
appropriate, structured activities that introduce students to the concept of
careers, connect academic learning to workplace applications, and provide
exposure to the range of career clusters and industry sectors reflected in the
Statewide Priority Industry List established pursuant to R.S. 17:189.4.
(2) Stage I activities shall be incorporated into the instructional program
for all students in grades kindergarten through six in public schools statewide.
Each local education agency shall ensure that Stage I activities are provided to
all students at each applicable grade level during each school year.
(3) Stage I activities may include but are not limited to the following:
(a) Career awareness lessons integrated into core academic subjects.
(b) Guest presentations or virtual career exploration experiences
featuring individuals working in priority industry sectors.
(c) School-wide career fairs, career field days, or similar structured
career activities.
(d) Age-appropriate exposure to the relationship between educational
choices and career pathways.
(e) Introduction to career interest and aptitude inventory tools adapted
for elementary grade levels.
(4) The state Department of Education, in consultation with the
Louisiana Community and Technical Colleges, shall make available to each
local education agency resources identifying age-appropriate activities aligned
Page 22 of 83
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-2719 ENGROSSED
SB NO. 524
with the priority industry sectors designated pursuant to R.S. 17:189.4.
C. Stage II: Career exploration grades seven through eight.
(1) Stage II shall encompass grades seven and eight and shall be designed
to deepen student career exploration through structured activities that connect
student career interests to specific industries, identified pathways, and
associated educational options. Stage II shall provide each student with the
foundational experience and information necessary to make an informed
pathway selection decision and to develop an Individual Career and Academic
Plan (ICAP) consistent with R.S. 17:189.7.
(2) Stage II activities shall be incorporated into the instructional and
advisory program for all students in grades seven and eight in public schools
statewide. Each local education agency shall ensure that Stage II activities are
provided to all students at each applicable grade level during each school year.
(3) Stage II activities shall include but not be limited to the following:
(a) Formal career interest and aptitude assessment activities conducted
with each student not later than the end of grade seven and reviewed with each
student not later than the end of grade eight.
(b) Information provided to each student and the student's parent or
legal guardian regarding available Jump Start pathways along with
corresponding occupational outcomes and credential requirements associated
with each pathway.
(c) Initiation of each student's ICAP consistent with the requirements of
R.S. 17:189.7.
(d)(i) At least one work-based learning activity at Level 1 under the
tiered work-based learning quality continuum established in R.S. 17:189.11 per
school year in each of grades seven and eight that provides students with first-
hand exposure to occupations within one or more priority industry sectors.
(ii) Activities shall be provided with the involvement of school-based
administrators, support staff, and local education agency administration.
Page 23 of 83
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-2719 ENGROSSED
SB NO. 524
D. Stage III: Career concentration grades nine through ten.
(1) Stage III shall encompass grades nine and ten and shall be designed
to transition students from career exploration to focused career concentration
for students who are seeking a Career Diploma.
(2) During Stage III, each student who has elected to pursue a Career
Diploma shall:
(a) With the assistance of a school counselor or career coach, finalize the
student's Individual Graduation Plan pursuant to R.S. 17:2925 designating the
Jump Start pathway as the student's chosen program of study.
(b)(i) Participate in at least one work-based learning activity at Level 2
or above under the tiered work-based learning quality continuum established
in R.S. 17:189.11.
(ii) Activities shall be provided with the involvement of school-based
administrators, support staff, and local education agency administration.
(3) Nothing in this Subsection shall limit the ability of a student, who has
not selected a Jump Start pathway in grades nine and ten, or relocated to a new
school or local education agency that does not offer an already selected Jump
Start pathway, to elect a Jump Start pathway in grade eleven or twelve,
consistent with the student's ability to complete all pathway requirements
before graduation.
E. Stage IV: Career completion grades eleven through twelve.
(1) Stage IV shall encompass grades eleven and twelve and shall be
designed to support each Jump Start pathway student in completing the
requirements for a Career Diploma, including the nine-credit Jump Start
course sequence, the required work-based learning activities, and the
attainment of an industry-based credential.
(2) During Stage IV, each student pursuing a Career Diploma shall:
(a) Complete the remaining credits of the nine credit Jump Start course
sequence required for Career Diploma completion under R.S. 17:189.10.
Page 24 of 83
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-2719 ENGROSSED
SB NO. 524
(b)(i) Participate in at least one work-based learning activity at Level 3
or above under the tiered work-based learning quality continuum established
in R.S. 17:189.11 for the student's designated pathway.
(ii) Activities shall be provided with the involvement of school-based
administrators, support staff, and local education agency administration.
(c) Prepare for and attempt to attain one or more credentials where
identified within an approved Jump Start pathway as established pursuant to
R.S. 17:189.12.
(3) Nothing in this Subsection shall limit the ability of a student, who has
relocated to a new school or local education agency that does not offer an
already selected Jump Start pathway, to elect a Jump Start pathway in grade
eleven or twelve, consistent with the student's ability to complete all pathway
requirements before graduation.
§189.7. Individual career and academic plans; graduation plans
A. Individual career and academic plan requirement, grade seven
initiation.
(1) Each student enrolled in a Louisiana public school shall have an
Individual Career and Academic Plan (ICAP), as defined in R.S. 17:189.2(8) ,
initiated not later than the beginning of grade seven. The ICAP shall serve as
the primary longitudinal career planning instrument connecting a student's
activities under Stage II of the Louisiana K-12 Jump Start Pathway Framework
established in R.S. 17:189.6 to the student's selection of an approved K-12 Jump
Start pathway.
(2) An ICAP shall be initiated with the active involvement of the student,
the student's parent or legal guardian, and a school counselor or career coach
as provided in R.S. 17:189.8 and consistent with Subsection D of this Section.
B. Annual review and update.
(1) Each student's Individual Career and Academic Plan shall be
reviewed and updated annually throughout grades seven through twelve. The
Page 25 of 83
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-2719 ENGROSSED
SB NO. 524
annual review shall occur in connection with the scheduling of courses for the
following academic year and shall be completed not later than sixty calendar
days before the end of the applicable academic year.
(2) The annual review shall be conducted with the involvement of the
student, the student's parent or legal guardian, and a school counselor or career
coach as provided in Subsection D of this Section. The annual review shall
address the following:
(a) Whether the student's identified career interests and pathway goals
remain current or require updating.
(b) Whether the student's course selections for the upcoming academic
year align with the student's pathway goals and graduation requirements.
(c) Students and parents shall have the opportunity to select Course
Choice offerings to meet course scheduling requirements.
(d) Whether the student's ICAP needs revision to reflect changes.
(3) The school counselor or career coach shall document each annual
review including the date on which the review occurred consistent with the
documentation requirements of Subsection D of this Section and the reporting
requirements of R.S. 17:189.8.
C. Connection to Authorized Jump Start Pathways.
(1) Each student's Individual Career and Academic Plan shall identify,
beginning not later than the end of grade eight, one or more Jump Start
pathways that align with the student's stated career interests and/or aptitude
assessment results. The identification of pathways in the ICAP shall not
constitute a student's enrollment in a pathway or a binding commitment to a
specific pathway but shall serve as the basis for future pathway selection.
(2) The state Department of Education shall make publicly available to
each local education agency a current list of approved Jump Start pathways,
including the required course sequence in a format suitable for use and
discussion during ICAP development and review activities with students and
Page 26 of 83
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-2719 ENGROSSED
SB NO. 524
their parents or legal guardians pursuant to R.S. 17:189.6.
(3) In all ICAP development and review activities, school counselors or
career coaches shall present to students and their parents or legal guardians
with available Jump Start pathways along with corresponding occupational
outcomes and credential requirements associated with each pathway.
D. Counselor involvement; documentation requirement.
(1) Each Individual Career and Academic Plan shall be developed,
annually reviewed, and revised with the active involvement of a school
counselor or career coach.
(2) A school counselor or career coach shall meet individually with each
student and their parents or legal guardians. Such individual meetings may
occur in person or virtually and shall include discussion of the student's career
interests, academic progress, Jump Start pathway options, and any
recommended revisions to the student's ICAP.
(3) The school counselor or career coach shall document the meeting to
include the following:
(a) Date of meeting.
(b) School counselor's or career coach's name.
(c) Name of student served.
(d) Names of parents or legal guardians in attendance.
(e) Any revisions made to the student's ICAP.
Such documentation shall be maintained as part of each student's
educational record consistent with the Family Educational Rights and Privacy
Act (FERPA), 20 U.S.C. 1232g, and R.S. 44:1 et seq.
E. Parent or legal guardian notification and approval.
(1) A student's parent or legal guardian shall be notified of and provided
an opportunity to participate in the initiation of the student's Individual Career
and Academic Plan and in each required annual review throughout grades
seven through twelve.
Page 27 of 83
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-2719 ENGROSSED
SB NO. 524
(2) Prior to formally revising a student's ICAP, the assigned school
counselor or career coach shall communicate with the student's parents or legal
guardians, in person or virtually, the rationale for any proposed revisions and
any potential impact on the student's graduation requirements and
postsecondary education goals. Any revision that changes the student's
identified pathway or postsecondary goals shall be approved by signature or in
writing by the student's parents or legal guardians.
(3) Nothing in this Subsection shall be construed to require parental
approval for an annual review that makes no substantive change to the
student's identified pathway or postsecondary goals, provided the parent or
legal guardian received notice of the review and an opportunity to participate.
(4) Each local education agency shall establish a formal communications
procedure for parental or guardian notification and for ICAP approval under
this Subsection.
F. Coordination with individual graduation plans.
(1) The state Department of Education shall assess the overlap of the
state requirement of the Individual Graduation Plan under R.S. 17:2925 for
students pursuing a Career Diploma and already engaged in an Individual
Career and Academic Plan. The assessment and recommendations shall be
submitted to the State Board of Elementary and Secondary Education and to
the chair of the House Committee on Education and the chair of the Senate
Committee on Education for consideration to administrative rules and statute
changes.
G. Student change of Jump Start Pathway; flexibility; parental approval.
(1) A student's Individual Career and Academic Plan shall be flexible
enough to permit a student to change their identified Jump Start pathway or
career goal during grades seven through twelve, consistent with Subsection E
of this Section.
(2) A school counselor or career coach shall not deny a student the
Page 28 of 83
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-2719 ENGROSSED
SB NO. 524
opportunity to change their Jump Start pathway designation in the student's
ICAP solely on the basis that the student has already enrolled in or begun a
course sequence associated with a different Jump Start pathway, but shall
advise the student and the student's parents or legal guardians of any course
and credit implications and graduation requirement implications of the
proposed change prior to formally approving the revision.
(3) A student who changes their Jump Start pathway designation after
beginning the nine credit Jump Start course sequence shall not be penalized in
the student's ICAP for credits already earned in the prior pathway, except as
necessary to ensure that the student meets the graduation requirements.
§189.8. Career counseling and career coaching standards
A. Minimum counselor-to-student ratio for Jump Start Pathway and
ICAP advising.
(1) Each local education agency shall ensure that school counselors
providing Jump Start pathway advising under this Subpart maintain an
advising caseload that allows them to fulfill the Individual Career and
Academic Plan requirements of R.S. 17:189.7 for every enrolled student in
grades seven through twelve.
(2) The State Board of Elementary and Secondary Education shall, not
later than one year after the effective date of this Subpart, adopt administrative
rules establishing:
(a) A maximum caseload ratio for school counselors providing ICAP
advising to students in grades seven through twelve.
(b) A method by which combined caseloads of school counselors and
career coaches at a school may be aggregated to determine compliance with the
maximum ratio.
(c) A reporting requirement by which each local education agency
annually certifies to the state Department of Education, the school counselor
and career coach staffing levels at each school and whether the advising
Page 29 of 83
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-2719 ENGROSSED
SB NO. 524
caseload ratio for each school complies with the maximum ratio established
under this Subsection.
(3) Nothing in this Subsection shall be construed to require any local
education agency to employ a school counselor if the local education agency
meets advising requirements.
B. ICAP and Jump Start pathway-specific counselor training
requirements.
(1) Each school counselor assigned Jump Start pathway advising
responsibilities, including Individual Career and Academic Plan development
and review under R.S.17:189.7, shall complete career and technical education-
specific training as described in this Subsection within eighteen months of the
effective date of this Subpart, or within eighteen months of initial assignment
to ICAP or Jump Start pathway advising responsibilities, whichever is later.
(2) Counselor training shall include, at a minimum, the following:
(a) An overview of the Louisiana Jump Start Career Diploma Program,
including the four-stage developmental framework established in R.S. 17:189.6,
the pathway authorization and approval process under R.S. 17:189.9 and R.S.
17:189.13, the work-based learning quality standards under R.S. 17:189.11 and
the tiered credential system under R.S. 17:189.12.
(b) Applied training in labor market data interpretation, including how
to use Louisiana Workforce Commission occupational forecasting data and the
priority occupation framework established in R.S. 17:189.4, to support student
pathway selection decisionmaking.
(c) Applied training in ICAP development, review, and documentation
under R.S. 17:189.7.
(d) Training on the postsecondary articulation agreements established
pursuant to R.S. 17:189.15 and on how to communicate postsecondary credit
transfer opportunities to students and their parents or legal guardians.
(e) An overview of the Course Choice Program.
Page 30 of 83
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-2719 ENGROSSED
SB NO. 524
(3) The Louisiana Community and Technical Colleges, in consultation
with the state Department of Education, shall publish a list of qualified training
curriculum vendors for local education agencies and school counselors. The
training curriculum shall be:
(a) Procured by the local education agency and provided at no cost to
school counselors employed by that local education agency.
(b) Available in online, hybrid, and in-person formats to accommodate
the professional development needs of school counselors.
(4) Each local education agency shall provide assurance annually to the
state Department of Education on the number of school counselors who
completed the training required by this Subsection.
C. Career Coach Authorization; ICAP and Jump Start Pathway-Specific
Training Requirements.
(1) Each local education agency may provide for Individual Career and
Academic Plan services required under R.S. 17:189.7 through the use of school
counselors, career coaches, or a combination of school counselors and career
coaches, subject to the limitations and requirements of this Section.
(2) A career coach authorized pursuant to this Subsection may perform
the following functions under this Subpart:
(a) Develop, review, and revise ICAPs with students and their parents or
legal guardians pursuant to R.S. 17:189.7.
(b) Provide career exploration, career awareness, and Jump Start
pathway advising services to students in grades seven through twelve.
(d) Participate in the Stage II and Stage III activities established in R.S.
17:189.6.
(3) An authorized career coach shall not:
(a) Perform any duty that is by law reserved exclusively to a licensed
school counselor, except as expressly authorized by this Subpart.
(b) Provide mental health counseling, crisis counseling, or any other
Page 31 of 83
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-2719 ENGROSSED
SB NO. 524
clinical counseling service.
(c) Satisfy any statutory or administrative requirement that specifically
mandates a licensed school counselor, without explicit authorization or another
applicable law to satisfy the requirement.
(4) To be authorized as a career coach under this Subpart, a person shall
meet the qualification standards established in Paragraph (5) of this Subsection.
A local education agency shall not authorize any person as a career coach for
purposes of this Subpart unless the person has been determined to meet the
qualification standards established under Paragraph (5) of this Subsection or
has received explicit permission from the state Department of Education or its
designee.
(5) Career coach training shall include, at a minimum, the following:
(a) An overview of the Louisiana Jump Start Career Diploma Program,
including the four-stage developmental framework established in R.S. 17:189.6,
the pathway authorization and approval process under R.S. 17:189.9 and R.S.
17:189.13, the work-based learning quality standards under R.S. 17:189.11, and
the tiered credential system under R.S. 17:189.12.
(b) Applied training in labor market data interpretation, including how
to use Louisiana Workforce Commission occupational forecasting data and the
priority occupation framework established in R.S. 17:189.4, to support student
pathway selection decisionmaking.
(c) Applied training in ICAP development, review, and documentation
under R.S. 17:189.7, including training on the coordination of ICAPs with
Individual Graduation Plans under R.S. 17:2925.
(d) Training on the postsecondary articulation agreements established
pursuant to R.S. 17:189.15 and on how to communicate postsecondary credit
transfer opportunities to students and their parents or legal guardians.
(e) An overview of the Course Choice Program.
(f) Such other qualifications as deemed necessary to ensure that career
Page 32 of 83
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-2719 ENGROSSED
SB NO. 524
coaches can provide high-quality, accurate career and pathway advising.
(6) The state Department of Education shall publish a list of qualified
training curriculum vendors for local education agencies and career coaches.
The training curriculum shall be:
(a) Procured by the local education agency and provided at no cost to
school counselors employed by that local education agency.
(b) Available in online, hybrid, and in-person formats to accommodate
the professional development needs of career coaches.
D. Regional consortia for school counselor and career coach training.
(1) Two or more local education agencies may form a regional
consortium for the purpose of jointly contracting training curriculum vendors,
sharing career coach personnel, or coordinating the delivery of services across
multiple local education agencies in a region. A regional consortium formed
pursuant to this Subsection may operate through an intergovernmental
agreement consistent with R.S. 33:1324 or such other legal mechanism as
permitted.
(2) A regional consortium formed pursuant to this Subsection shall
ensure that each participating local education agency satisfies the ICAP
development and review requirements of R.S. 17:189.7 for all enrolled students
in grades seven through twelve.
(3) A regional consortium formed pursuant to this Subsection may take
advantage of group purchasing, regional contracting, and other economies of
scale to reduce the cost of services consistent with applicable state procurement
law.
E. Reporting requirements; counseling activity documentation.
(1) Each local education agency shall provide annually to the state
Department of Education documentation on the following information for the
prior academic year:
(a) The number of school counselors and career coaches employed or
Page 33 of 83
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-2719 ENGROSSED
SB NO. 524
contracted by the LEA who provided Jump Start pathway and ICAP advising
services, disaggregated by school.
(b) The number of students in grades seven through twelve who received
an ICAP initiation, review, or update meeting with a school counselor or career
coach for the prior academic year, disaggregated by school and grade level.
(c) Any schools that were not able to meet the ICAP maintenance
obligation pursuant to R.S. 17:189.7, including the number of students without
a current ICAP.
(2) The state Department of Education shall make available on its
publicly accessible website, not later than December first of each year, a
summary of Jump Start pathway and ICAP advising services reports submitted
by all local education agencies for the prior academic year.
§189.9. Jump Start pathway structure; designation; components; regional
teams
A. Pathway framework established.
(1) There is hereby established within the Louisiana Jump Start Career
Diploma Program "Louisiana K-12 Jump Start Pathway Authorization
Framework", through which Jump Start pathways shall be proposed, reviewed,
authorized, and reauthorized. All K-12 Jump Start pathways shall operate
within the framework.
(2) All K-12 Jump Start pathways authorized under this Subpart shall
be designated as either statewide pathways or regional pathways, and shall
satisfy the minimum pathway components established in Subsection E of this
Section and the authorization criteria established in R.S. 17:189.13.
(3) No local education agency shall offer or deliver a Jump Start pathway
for purposes of awarding a Career Diploma unless that pathway has been
authorized.
(4) The Louisiana K-12 Jump Start Pathway Authorization Framework
shall be administered by the collaborative consistent with the jurisdictional
Page 34 of 83
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-2719 ENGROSSED
SB NO. 524
boundaries established in R.S. 17:189.3.
B. Statewide pathways; requirements.
(1) A statewide pathway shall be available for delivery by any local
education agency in Louisiana that satisfies the conditions of Jump Start
pathway authorization established in R.S. 17:189.13.
(2) To be eligible for designation as a statewide Jump Start pathway, a
proposed pathway shall:
(a) Be aligned to one or more occupations within an industry sector
included on the Statewide Priority Industry List established pursuant to R.S.
17:189.4.
(b) Be anchored to one or more credentials approved by the Louisiana
Workforce Investment Council pursuant to R.S. 23:2065 or R.S. 17:189.12.
(c) Include a structured nine-credit Jump Start course sequence meeting
the requirements of R.S. 17:189.10.
(d) Incorporate a work-based learning component meeting the minimum
tier and quality standards established in R.S. 17:189.11.
(e) Demonstrate alignment with documented statewide employer demand
for the occupations served by the Jump Start pathway, using the data sources
specified in R.S. 17:189.4.
(f) Satisfy all required Jump Start pathway components established in
Subsection E of this Section.
(3) The state Department of Education shall maintain and publish a
current list of all authorized statewide Jump Start pathways, including the
industry sector, credentials, and occupational outcomes associated with each
pathway, updated within thirty calendar days of any pathway authorization,
modification, reauthorization, or deauthorization.
C. Regional pathways; requirements.
(1) A regional pathway, as defined in R.S. 17:189.2(18), shall be
developed by a regional team as described in Subsection F of this Section and
Page 35 of 83
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-2719 ENGROSSED
SB NO. 524
shall be available for delivery only within a local or regional workforce
development designated area.
(2) To be eligible for designation as a regional Jump Start pathway, a
proposed pathway shall:
(a) Be aligned to one or more occupations within an industry sector
included on the applicable Regional Priority Industry List established pursuant
to R.S. 17:189.4.
(b) Be anchored to one or more industry-based credentials approved by
the Louisiana Workforce Investment Council pursuant to R.S. 23:2065 or R.S.
17:189.12.
(c) Include a structured nine-credit Jump Start course sequence meeting
the requirements of R.S. 17:189.10.
(d) Incorporate a work-based learning component meeting the minimum
tier and quality standards established in R.S. 17:189.11.
(e) Demonstrate alignment with documented regional employer demand
for the occupations served by the Jump Start pathway.
(f) Satisfy all required Jump Start pathway components established in
Subsection E of this Section.
(3) A regional Jump Start pathway shall adhere to the same academic
credit requirements as statewide pathways, consistent with R.S. 17:189.10.
(4) The collaborative shall not recommend authorization of a regional
pathway for an occupation within an industry sector that is not included on the
applicable Regional Priority Industry List for the local or regional workforce
development region in which the pathway would be delivered, consistent with
R.S. 17:189.4.
(5) The state Department of Education shall maintain and publish a
current list of all authorized regional Jump Start pathways, including the
industry sector, credentials, and occupational outcomes associated with each
pathway, updated within thirty calendar days of any pathway authorization,
Page 36 of 83
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-2719 ENGROSSED
SB NO. 524
modification, reauthorization, or deauthorization.
D. Pathway tiers; designation criteria.
(1) The collaborative shall establish and maintain a tiered designation
system for authorized Jump Start pathways, assigning each pathway to tiers
based on industry alignment, credential value, and postsecondary and
occupational outcomes.
(2) The collaborative shall assign each authorized pathway a tier
designation at the time of initial authorization and shall reassess tier designation
at each reauthorization under R.S. 17:189.13 and at any time when changes in
credential tier status under R.S. 17:189.12 occur that affect the pathway's tier
eligibility.
E. Required pathway components minimum elements.
(1) Each K-12 Jump Start pathway authorized under this Subpart,
whether statewide or regional, shall at a minimum include all of the following
components:
(a) A structured, sequential career and technical education course of
study organized around a defined career field within a recognized career
cluster, consisting of not fewer than nine credits as required by R.S. 17:189.10.
(b) A work-based learning component meeting the minimum tier and
quality standards established in R.S. 17:189.11.
(c) One or more credentials pursuant to R.S. 17:189.12 that are aligned
to the occupational outcomes of the pathway.
(d) A documented connection to one or more priority occupations, as
defined in R.S. 17:189.2(17) , in an industry sector on the Statewide Priority
Industry List or a Regional Priority Industry List, consistent with the
requirements of R.S. 17:189.4.
(e) An articulation agreement with at least one Louisiana public
postsecondary institution, with priority given to Louisiana community and
technical colleges, specifying the credit transfer terms applicable to students
Page 37 of 83
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-2719 ENGROSSED
SB NO. 524
who complete the pathway, consistent with the requirements of R.S. 17:189.15.
(f) A career counseling and career coaching plan satisfying the
requirements of R.S. 17:189.8, as incorporated into the local education agency's
pupil progression plan pursuant to R.S. 17:189.8(G).
(2) No Jump Start pathway shall be authorized or reauthorized unless
all components in Paragraph (1) of this Subsection are documented in the
pathway authorization proposal under R.S. 17:189.13 and are maintained
throughout the pathway's authorization period.
(3) The State Board of Elementary and Secondary Education shall, by
rule adopted pursuant to the Administrative Procedure Act, R.S. 49:950 et seq.,
establish additional minimum standards for each required pathway component
where necessary to ensure consistent Jump Start pathway quality across the
state. Any such additional pathway standards shall not be less rigorous than the
standards established by this Section and by R.S. 17:189.10 through R.S.
17:189.15.
F. Regional team structure; composition; responsibilities.
(1) The collaborative, in consultation with Louisiana Works, Louisiana
Economic Development, and the Board of Regents, shall establish regional
areas. Each region of Louisiana shall have a regional team responsible for
regional Jump Start pathway development and oversight as provided in this
Subsection.
(2) Each regional team shall be led or facilitated by an institution that
falls under Louisiana Community and Technical Colleges and shall be
composed of, at minimum, all of the following members:
(a) Representatives of not fewer than two local education agencies
operating within the workforce development region.
(b) A representative from not fewer than one Louisiana public
postsecondary institution operating within or adjacent to the workforce
development region.
Page 38 of 83
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-2719 ENGROSSED
SB NO. 524
(c) Not fewer than three representatives from business and industry
operating within the workforce development region, of which at least two shall
be representatives of businesses in priority industry sectors designated pursuant
to R.S. 17:189.4 for the region.
(3) Each regional team shall:
(a) Develop and submit to the collaborative a proposed Regional Priority
Industry List and update that list as required by R.S. 17:189.4.
(b) Identify regional workforce development needs and propose regional
Jump Start pathways for authorization under R.S. 17:189.13 that are aligned
to the region's documented labor market demand.
(c) Coordinate with local education agencies within the region to support
the development, delivery, and continuous improvement of authorized regional
Jump Start pathways.
(d) Recruit and establish employer partnerships for work-based learning
placements consistent with R.S. 17:189.11.
(e) Participate in mid-cycle Jump Start pathway reviews as required.
(f) Prepare and submit to the collaborative an annual regional report
documenting regional Jump Start pathway data, consistent with data elements
required by R.S. 17:189.18.
(4) The Louisiana Community and Technical Colleges shall establish
regional team operational procedures for:
(a) The selection and rotation of regional team members.
(b) Regional team decisionmaking, proposal submissions, and reporting
obligations.
G. Partnering authority; cross-district enrollment; program sharing.
(1) A local education agency that does not have sufficient capacity to
independently deliver an authorized Jump Start pathway may fulfill its
obligations through one or more of the following arrangements:
(a) A formal partnership with one or more other local education agencies
Page 39 of 83
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-2719 ENGROSSED
SB NO. 524
within a workforce development region to jointly deliver a Jump Start pathway,
as authorized by applicable Louisiana law governing cooperative endeavors and
intergovernmental agreements.
(b) A partnership with a Louisiana community and technical college,
consistent with R.S. 17:189.17.
(2) Any partnering arrangement under this Subsection shall be
memorialized in a written Memorandum of Understanding (MOU) and
submitted to the collaborative as part of any pathway authorization or
reauthorization proposal under R.S. 17:189.13.
(3) No student shall be assessed a fee for participation in a Jump Start
pathway offered through a partnering arrangement under this Subsection. All
pathway-related costs incurred in connection with a partnering arrangement
shall be funded through available local, state, and federal career and technical
education funds, or other lawfully available appropriations.
(4) A local education agency that participates in a partnering
arrangement under this Subsection remains responsible for ensuring that the
enrolled students receive ICAP services required under R.S. 17:189.7 and R.S.
17:189.8, regardless of the site at which instruction is delivered.
§189.10. Career Major Program; general requirements
A. Career Major Program.
(1) Each authorized K-12 Jump Start pathway under this Subpart shall
include a Career Major Program that constitutes the core academic and
technical coursework sequence through which a student pursues a Career
Diploma and the nine-credit Jump Start career and technical education course
sequence established in Subsection C of this Section.
(2) A Career Major Program shall be developed in alignment with the
career cluster and occupational focus of an authorized Jump Start pathway and
shall reflect the credential standards required for pathway completion.
(3) The collaborative, or its designee, shall maintain Career Major
Page 40 of 83
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-2719 ENGROSSED
SB NO. 524
Program frameworks for each authorized statewide Jump Start pathway. For
regional Jump Start pathways, a regional team shall submit a Career Major
Program proposal as part of its pathway authorization submission under R.S.
17:189.13.
(4) Each Career Major Program framework shall identify:
(a) Required academic core courses and credit hours.
(b) Required career and technical education course sequence and credit
hours.
(c) Assessment requirements under Subsection D of this Section.
(d) Required credential or credentials.
(e) Work-based learning requirements applicable to the pathway.
(f) Any dual enrollment or early postsecondary access opportunities
available within the pathway under Subsection G of this Section.
B. Academic core credit requirements.
(1) Students pursuing a Career Diploma through an authorized Jump
Start pathway shall satisfy the academic core credit requirements established
by the State Board of Elementary and Secondary Education pursuant to R.S.
17:7 and this Subpart. Academic core credit requirements for Career Diploma
students shall be equivalent in rigor and content coverage to those required for
a standard diploma.
(2) Nothing in this Subsection shall preclude the State Board of
Elementary and Secondary Education from establishing equivalent but
differentiated elective course options for students pursuing a Career Diploma
that replace nonrequired elective courses in the standard diploma track,
provided that the differentiated options are aligned to the student's ICAP and
Career Major Program.
(3) Academic core credits earned through approved dual enrollment
courses pursuant to Subsection G of this Section shall count toward the
academic core credit requirements of this Subsection, consistent with R.S.
Page 41 of 83
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-2719 ENGROSSED
SB NO. 524
17:2930 and the provisions of R.S. 17:189.15.
C. Career and technical education course sequence; Jump Start credits.
(1) To earn a Career Diploma, a student shall complete a structured
career and technical education course sequence within an authorized Jump
Start pathway, consisting of not fewer than nine credits, hereinafter "the
nine-credit Jump Start course sequence". The nine-credit Jump Start course
sequence shall be composed of courses that are:
(a) Organized sequentially to build progressively on technical knowledge
and skills from introductory through advanced levels of pathway-specific
competencies.
(b) Aligned to the standards required for a credential or credentials
associated with a pathway.
(c) Delivered by instructors who meet the qualification standards
established under R.S. 17:189.17.
(d) Approved by the collaborative as part of the Career Major Program
framework for the pathway pursuant to Subsection A of this Section.
(2) Of the nine required Jump Start credits, not fewer than two credits
shall be earned through courses that include a work-based learning component
at or above Level 3 of the tiered quality continuum established in R.S.
17:189.11.
(3) Any credit earned through examination or dual enrollment course
aligned to the Jump Start pathway may count toward the nine-credit Jump
Start course sequence as part of the Career Major Program framework and
consistent with the early postsecondary access provisions of Subsection G of this
Section and R.S. 17:2930.
D. Assessment requirements.
(1) Students pursuing a Career Diploma shall, during the course of the
nine-credit Jump Start course sequence, complete all assessments required as
a condition of the credential or credentials associated with a Jump Start
Page 42 of 83
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-2719 ENGROSSED
SB NO. 524
pathway.
(2) Credential assessment results shall be reported as part of the
collaborative's annual report, disaggregated by pathway, local education
agency, and other categories specified in R.S. 17:189.18.
(3) Nothing in this Subsection shall limit the authority of the State Board
of Elementary and Secondary Education to require state-administered
assessments for students pursuing a Career Diploma.
E. Career major program access criteria.
(1) Each local education agency operating an authorized Jump Start
pathway shall ensure that the Career Major Program courses associated with
the pathway are accessible to all students who have selected the pathway as part
of their ICAP process.
(2) No admission criteria for a Career Major Program shall be developed
unless the collaborative determines, upon documented evidence, that such
criteria are necessary for a specific pathway due to technical prerequisite
knowledge or by applicable occupational licensing requirements. Any such
performance-based access criteria shall be included in the Jump Start pathway
authorization proposal submitted under R.S. 17:189.13.
(3) Enrollment management procedures may be developed by a local
education agency for a Career Major Program where the number of students
seeking enrollment exceeds program capacity. Procedures shall ensure that
students and their parents or legal guardians receive ICAP counseling and
alternative Jump Start pathway options if they are unable to enroll in their
first-choice Jump Start pathway consistent with R.S. 17:189.8.
(4) Students with disabilities shall have access to Career Major Programs
consistent with their Individualized Education Programs (IEP) and applicable
federal and state special education laws.
F. Local education agency curriculum submission and approval.
(1) A local education agency shall not offer a Career Major Program
Page 43 of 83
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-2719 ENGROSSED
SB NO. 524
curriculum that has not been approved by the collaborative. Any material
modification to an approved Career Major Program curriculum shall require
resubmission. A modification is material if it changes:
(a) One or more courses in the nine-credit Jump Start course sequence.
(b) The required credential or credential tier.
(c) The work-based learning component.
(2) Each local education agency shall communicate annually to the
parents or legal guardians of a student enrolled in, or considering enrollment
in, an authorized Jump Start pathway. This communication shall be
incorporated into the notification obligations of R.S. 17:189.7 and shall occur
not later than thirty calendar days before a course selection period for the
upcoming academic year.
G. Dual enrollment; early postsecondary access.
(1) Students enrolled in an authorized Jump Start pathway are
encouraged to pursue early postsecondary credit opportunities through courses
that include accelerated credit such as Advanced Placement (AP) and
International Baccalaureate (IB), credit by examination such as College-Level
Examination Program (CLEP), and Fast Forward dual enrollment
opportunities in postsecondary courses aligned to their pathway, consistent with
R.S. 17:2930 and the postsecondary articulation agreements required under
R.S. 17:189.15.
(2) Each Career Major Program framework developed pursuant to
Subsection A of this Section shall identify, where available, approved early
postsecondary credit opportunities that:
(a) Are aligned to the standards of the Jump Start pathway.
(b) Count toward the nine-credit Jump Start course sequence.
(c) For dual enrollment courses, are offered through a Louisiana public
postsecondary institution that has executed an articulation agreement with the
local education agency or regional team pursuant to R.S. 17:189.15.
Page 44 of 83
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-2719 ENGROSSED
SB NO. 524
(3) No student enrolled in a local education agency shall be charged
tuition or fees for dual enrollment course approved as part of a Career Major
Program framework, to the extent permitted by applicable state law governing
funds for career development and dual enrollment programs.
H. Students with exceptionalities; alternative graduation pathway.
Nothing in this Section shall be construed to preclude a student with an
exceptionality, as defined in R.S. 17:1942, from accessing, enrolling in, or
receiving a Career Diploma through an authorized K-12 Jump Start pathway.
Each local education agency shall ensure that the Career Major Program
requirements of this Section are implemented in a manner consistent with each
eligible student's Individualized Education Program (IEP), applicable
provisions of the Individuals with Disabilities Education Act, 20 U.S.C. 1401 et
seq., and Section 504 of the Rehabilitation Act of 1973, 29 U.S.C. 794.
§189.11. Work-based learning; quality standards and tiered requirements
A. Work-based learning quality continuum; four-level tiered framework.
(1) There is hereby established the "Louisiana Jump Start Work-Based
Learning Quality Continuum". The continuum shall consist of four levels
organized from least to most intensive as set forth in Paragraphs (2) through (5)
of this Subsection. All work-based learning activities for Jump Start pathway
purposes shall be classified at one of the four continuum levels.
(2) Level 1: Career awareness activities. Level 1 of the continuum
includes structured career awareness experiences that introduce students to
occupational roles and workplace environments without a direct employer-
supervised placement component.
(a) Level 1 activities include, but are not limited to:
(i) Employer-in-classroom presentations.
(ii) Virtual career tours.
(iii) Career fairs with organized student interaction with industry
representatives.
Page 45 of 83
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-2719 ENGROSSED
SB NO. 524
(iv) Informational classroom-based activities connecting academic
content to career contexts within a priority industry sector.
(b) Level 1 activities qualify under Stage I and Stage II of the four-stage
framework established in R.S. 17:189.6 ; but, Level 1 activities do not satisfy the
minimum work-based learning requirement for Jump Start credit under
Subsection B of this Section.
(3) Level 2: Career exploration activities. Level 2 of the continuum
includes structured employer engagement activities that provide students with
direct, supervised observation of workplace operations and occupational roles.
(a) Level 2 activities include but are not limited to:
(i) Job shadowing experiences.
(ii) Employer site visits organized for career exploration purposes.
(iii) Structured career mentoring sessions in which a student works
individually with an industry professional to explore career options and
workplace expectations.
(b) Level 2 activities must not be less than four hours in duration, must
include a structured reflection component, and must be documented by the
supervising school counselor, career coach, or CTE instructor consistent with
Subsection D of this Section.
(4) Level 3: Project-based, school-based enterprises, and cooperative
education experiences. Level 3 of the continuum includes structured learning
experiences in which students apply pathway-specific technical knowledge and
skills in an employer-led context.
(a) Level 3 activities include but are not limited to:
(i) Project-based learning experiences conducted in partnership with an
employer.
(ii) Supervised cooperative education placements with an employer not
in a priority industry sector.
(iii) School-based enterprise programs with documented employer
Page 46 of 83
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-2719 ENGROSSED
SB NO. 524
advisory involvement.
(b) Level 3 activities must include a documented employer partnership
consistent with Subsection C of this Section and a student performance
evaluation by the employer or employer representative, and must be supervised
by a qualified CTE instructor or other authorized professional.
(c) Completion of a Level 3 activity must not be fewer than the required
hours set by the state Department of Education for the activity.
(d) To the extent permitted under applicable local, state, and federal laws
and available funds, students shall be compensated during the duration of their
Level 3 activities.
(5) Level 4: Youth apprenticeship and internship programs. Level 4 of
the continuum includes extended structured employer-supervised work
experiences that provide students with direct on-the-job training based on
pathway-specific technical knowledge and skills.
(a) Level 4 activities align to rules and requirements set forth by
Louisiana Works for Youth Apprenticeships and the State Board of Elementary
and Secondary Education for Internships.
B. Employer partnership requirements.
(1) Each local education agency operating an authorized Jump Start
pathway shall maintain documented employer partnerships sufficient to provide
Level 3 or above work-based learning placements for all students enrolled in the
pathway at Stage III or Stage IV of the four-stage framework established in R.S.
17:189.6.
(2) A documented employer partnership for purposes of this Section
shall consist of a written agreement between the local education agency and the
employer that specifies:
(a) The nature of the work-based learning activities to be provided,
including the WBL tier level under Subsection A of this Section.
(b) The number of students the employer will accept for WBL
Page 47 of 83
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-2719 ENGROSSED
SB NO. 524
placements during the applicable school year.
(c) The employer's responsibilities for student supervision, performance
evaluation, and documentation.
(d) The local education agency's responsibilities for student supervision,
performance evaluation, and documentation.
(e) The agreed compensation arrangement, if applicable, including
compliance with local, state, and federal laws governing student work
arrangements.
(f) The process for the local education agency to conduct site visits
consistent with Subsection D of this Section.
(3) An employer participating in a WBL partnership under this Section
shall designate a qualified workplace supervisor for each student placed with
the employer. The workplace supervisor shall be responsible for:
(a) Providing day-to-day supervision and technical guidance to the
student.
(b) Completing the student performance evaluation required under
Subsection D of this Section.
(c) Communicating with the local education agency regarding student
progress and placement conditions.
(4) Regional teams shall facilitate employer partnership development for
regional pathways within their workforce development region, consistent with
R.S. 17:189.9, and shall maintain a current directory of employers within the
region who have executed or expressed interest in executing WBL partnership
agreements.
C. Documentation, quality assurance, and site oversight.
(1) Each local education agency shall maintain documentation of all
work-based learning activities conducted for purposes of satisfying Jump Start
pathway requirements. Such documentation shall be maintained as part of the
student's educational record consistent with FERPA, 20 U.S.C. 1232g, and R.S.
Page 48 of 83
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-2719 ENGROSSED
SB NO. 524
44:1 et seq., and shall include:
(a) The WBL tier level of the activity.
(b) The employer partner's name and contact information.
(c) The start and end dates of the WBL activity.
(d) The total hours completed by the student for the WBL activity.
(e) The employer's written performance evaluation of the student for
Level 3 and Level 4 WBL activities.
(f) The supervising CTE instructor's or other authorized professional's
assessment of the student's work-based learning engagement and experience.
(2) Each local education agency shall conduct at least one oversight site
visit per academic year to each employer partner providing Level 3 and Level
4 WBL placements. The site visit shall be conducted by a qualified CTE
instructor or other authorized professional, and shall:
(a) Confirm that the employer is fulfilling the obligations specified in the
employer partnership agreement under Subsection B of this Section.
(b) Confirm that student placement conditions comply with applicable
state and federal health, safety, and labor laws.
(c) Document any concerns or deficiencies observed and the corrective
action taken or planned.
(d) Obtain the employer's completed performance evaluation of each
student placed with the employer.
(3) Data reporting obligations for work-based learning activities
including student participation and completion rates by WBL tier level;
employer partnership counts; and oversight site visit records, shall be governed
by R.S. 17:189.18.
§189.12. Credentials; tiered classification system; accountability interation
A. Credential authority and integration.
(1) The review, approval, and tier classification of credentials shall be
governed by the Louisiana Workforce Investment Council in coordination with
Page 49 of 83
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-2719 ENGROSSED
SB NO. 524
the Board of Regents, and the Louisiana Community and Technical Colleges,
agencies representing industry-based credentials, postsecondary credentials,
and professional licenses.
(2) The Louisiana Workforce Investment Council shall maintain and
publish a current online registry of all credentials designated for use in
authorized Jump Start pathways under this Subpart, organized by credential
name, issuing body, and tier classification under Subsection B of this Section.
The online registry shall be updated within thirty calendar days of any addition,
modification, or removal of a credential.
B. Tiered credential classification system.
The system shall classify all approved or designated credentials in tiers
reflecting the degree to which the credential is associated with priority
occupations under R.S. 17:189.2(17) and occupational outcomes in Louisiana's
workforce.
C. Credential review.
(1) The collaborative, or its designee, shall conduct a review of each
credential included on the registry maintained under Subsection A of this
Section as part of each Biennial Priority Review under R.S. 17:189.4 and at any
time the collaborative receives information that a credential may no longer
satisfy the classification criteria applicable to its current tier designation or the
credential may be misplaced in a tier.
(2) Upon documented analysis, the collaborative may recommend to the
Louisiana Workforce Investment Council the reclassification of a credential to
a different tier or remove a credential from the registry.
§189.13. Jump Start pathway authorization; review and reauthorization
A. Application process for Jump Start pathway authorization.
(1) A local education agency or regional team seeking to establish an
authorized Jump Start pathway shall submit a proposal to the collaborative.
Following the proposal review, the collaborative shall submit a written
Page 50 of 83
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-2719 ENGROSSED
SB NO. 524
recommendation to the State Board of Elementary and Secondary Education
regarding authorization.
(2) A Jump Start pathway authorization proposal shall include, at
minimum, all of the following:
(a) A description of the proposed pathway, including the career cluster,
occupational focus, and workforce development region or regions for which
authorization is sought.
(b) Documentation of alignment between the proposed pathway and the
applicable Statewide Priority Industry List or Regional Priority Industry List
under R.S. 17:189.4, including the data sources on which the alignment
determination is based.
(c) A wage analysis documenting the expected wage premium associated
with the credential.
(d) The Career Major Program framework required under R.S.
17:189.10, including the nine-credit Jump Start course sequence and academic
core credit requirements.
(e) Documentation of the credential or credentials required for pathway
completion, including the tier classification of each credential under R.S.
17:189.12, if applicable.
(f) A work-based learning plan describing the employer partnership
structure, the required tier level, and documentation and oversight procedures
consistent with R.S. 17:189.11.
(g) Evidence of the postsecondary articulation agreement required under
R.S. 17:189.15, or a documented timeline for where an agreement has not yet
been finalized at the time of proposal submission.
(h) Identification of the pathway tier designation sought under R.S.
17:189.9.
(i) A counseling and career coaching plan describing how the LEA will
satisfy the ICAP and advising requirements of R.S. 17:189.7 and R.S. 17:189.8.
Page 51 of 83
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-2719 ENGROSSED
SB NO. 524
(j) For regional pathways, a copy of any partnering agreement under
R.S. 17:189.9 and documentation from the regional team supporting the
proposal.
(k) Such additional information as the collaborative may require.
(3) The collaborative shall publish and maintain a pathway authorization
proposal form updated not less than annually.
B. Jump Start pathway authorization criteria.
(1) The collaborative shall recommend authorization of a proposed Jump
Start pathway to the State Board of Elementary and Secondary Education upon
concluding the proposal satisfies all of the following:
(a) The pathway is aligned to an occupation within an industry sector on
the applicable Priority Industry List, consistent with the requirements of R.S.
17:189.4.
(b) The pathway includes all required pathway components established
in R.S. 17:189.9.
(c) The Career Major Program curriculum meets the standards of R.S.
17:189.10.
(d) The work-based learning component meets the standards of R.S.
17:189.11.
(e) The required credential satisfies the threshold of R.S. 17:189.12.
(f) The postsecondary articulation agreement required by R.S. 17:189.15
has been executed or a documented timeline has been approved.
(g) The proposing local education agency or regional team has
demonstrated, through a recently submitted annual counseling activity report
under R.S. 17:189.8, that the counseling and career coaching infrastructure is
appropriate.
(h) The wage premium analysis submitted under Subsection A of this
Section documents a positive expected wage premium associated with the
identified pathway credential.
Page 52 of 83
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-2719 ENGROSSED
SB NO. 524
(2) The collaborative shall transmit its written recommendation,
including the appropriate tier for a credential and whether Louisiana Works
deems the credential to be of high value, to the State Board of Elementary and
Secondary Education not later than sixty calendar days after receipt of a
complete pathway authorization proposal.
(3) The State Board of Elementary and Secondary Education shall act
on the collaborative's written recommendation not later than sixty calendar
days after receipt. If the board does not act within sixty calendar days of
receipt, the collaborative's recommendation shall be deemed approved.
C. Jump Start pathway authorization conditions.
(1) Each Jump Start pathway authorization issued under this Section
shall be subject to the following conditions, which must be satisfied at the time
of authorization and maintained throughout the pathway's authorization
period:
(a) The pathway remains aligned to an occupation within an industry
sector on the applicable Priority Industry List, consistent with R.S. 17:189.4.
(b) The pathway's credential remains approved or designated under R.S.
17:189.12.
(c) The Career Major Program curriculum and nine-credit Jump Start
course sequence remain materially consistent with the approved curriculum
submitted under R.S. 17:189.10.
(d) The work-based learning component provides Level 3 or Level 4
placements for enrolled students, consistent with R.S. 17:189.11.
(e) The postsecondary articulation agreement under R.S. 17:189.15
remains in effect.
(f) The local education agency maintains the counseling and career
coaching standards required by R.S. 17:189.8 for students enrolled in the
pathway.
(g) The local education agency annually reports pathway data consistent
Page 53 of 83
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-2719 ENGROSSED
SB NO. 524
with the requirements of R.S. 17:189.18.
(2) Any change to an authorized pathway that affects a condition listed
in Paragraph (1) of this Subsection shall be reported by the local education
agency or regional team in writing to the collaborative within thirty calendar
days of the change.
D. Five-year Jump Start pathway authorization cycle.
(1) Each authorized Jump Start pathway shall be subject to a
reauthorization review not less frequently than once every five years from the
date of initial authorization or most recent reauthorization, as applicable. No
pathway shall continue to operate as an authorized Jump Start pathway beyond
the five-year authorization period without reauthorization.
(2) The collaborative shall maintain and publish a schedule of upcoming
pathway reauthorization reviews, updated not less than annually, identifying
each authorized pathway, the date of initial authorization or last
reauthorization, and the next scheduled reauthorization date.
(3) If the collaborative's reauthorization review process for a Jump Start
pathway is not completed before the expiration of the pathway's five-year
authorization period, the pathway's authorization shall be extended on a
holdover basis for not more than one academic year while the reauthorization
review is completed.
(4) The five-year pathway authorization cycle is distinct from and
independent of the biennial priority review under R.S. 17:189.4; neither satisfies
nor substitutes for the other.
E. Jump Start pathway mid-cycle review triggers.
(1) An authorized Jump Start pathway shall be subject to a mid-cycle
review upon the occurrence of any of the following triggering events:
(a) The Louisiana Jump Start Collaborative removes from the Statewide
Priority Industry List or applicable Regional Priority Industry List the industry
sector to which the pathway is aligned.
Page 54 of 83
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-2719 ENGROSSED
SB NO. 524
(b) The required credential for the pathway is reclassified or removed
in a manner that affects the pathway's tier compliance.
(c) The collaborative identifies that a pathway's credential attainment
rate has fallen below fifty percent for two consecutive academic years.
(d) The postsecondary articulation agreement required for the pathway
under R.S. 17:189.15 expires or is terminated without replacement.
(e) The collaborative, by a vote of not fewer than two thirds voting
members, determines that material changes in regional or statewide labor
market conditions warrant an earlier review.
(2) Upon the occurrence of a triggering event under Paragraph (1) of this
Subsection, the collaborative shall:
(a) Notify the affected local education agency or regional team of a mid-
cycle review.
(b) Complete the mid-cycle review within ninety calendar days of
notification.
(c) Transmit a written recommendation to the State Board of
Elementary and Secondary Education regarding continuation, modification, or
conclusion of the pathway's authorization.
F. Pathway modification; suspension; sunset provisions.
(1) A local education agency operating an authorized Jump Start
pathway may propose a material modification to the pathway by submitting a
pathway modification proposal to the collaborative. A modification is material
if it affects any of the authorization conditions established in Subsection C of
this Section.
(a) Nonmaterial changes may be implemented by a local education
agency or regional team with notification to the collaborative.
(2) The collaborative may recommend suspension of a Jump Start
pathway's authorization when the local education agency or regional team has
failed to maintain one or more authorization conditions under Subsection C of
Page 55 of 83
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-2719 ENGROSSED
SB NO. 524
this Section and has not remediated the deficiency or a mid-cycle review under
Subsection E of this Section and identifies conditions that present an immediate
risk to enrolled students.
(3) Suspension of a Jump Start pathway's authorization may not take
effect until the State Board of Elementary and Secondary Education has acted
on the collaborative's suspension recommendation.
(4) A Jump Start pathway whose authorization has been suspended shall
not enroll new students in the pathway during the suspension period. Students
already enrolled in a suspended pathway shall be permitted to complete the
pathway if the suspension is expected to be resolved before the students'
expected graduation date or offered alternative pathway options by the local
education agency if the suspension cannot be resolved within a timeframe that
allows the student to complete the pathway before graduation.
(5) A Jump Start pathway that has been discontinued, or whose
authorization has not been renewed, shall be formally sunset. The local
education agency or regional team shall give enrolled students not less than one
full academic year's advance notice of a planned sunset and shall identify
alternative pathway options for affected students.
§189.14. Rural LEA access; differentiated provisions and thresholds
A. Rural LEA classification.
(1) For purposes of this Subpart, a local education agency shall be
classified as a "rural local education agency" upon meeting one or more of the
following criteria:
(a) The local education agency is located in a parish where the
population density, as determined from the most recently published federal
decennial census data, is fewer than one hundred persons per square mile.
(b) The local education agency's total public K-12 student enrollment,
as reported in the most recently published annual enrollment data of the state
Department of Education, is fewer than four thousand students.
Page 56 of 83
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-2719 ENGROSSED
SB NO. 524
(c) The local education agency's primary service area has been classified
as a rural locale under the National Center for Education Statistics, NCES,
locale classification framework maintained by the United States Department of
Education, specifically as Locale Code 41 Rural Fringe, 42 Rural Distant, or 43
Rural Remote, under the most recently published NCES locale classification
data.
(2) In addition to the criteria established in Paragraph (1) of this
Subsection, the collaborative may, upon written request by a local education
agency, certify it as a rural local education agency for purposes of this Section
upon finding the local education agency faces structural access barriers
established by the collaborative.
(3) The collaborative shall review and reconfirm rural LEA
classifications under this Section not less frequently than once every five years,
coordinated with the five-year pathway reauthorization cycle under R.S.
17:189.13. A local education agency that no longer meets any criterion in
Paragraph (1) of the Subsection or any basis for certification under Paragraph
(2) of this Subsection shall be transitioned to standard pathway authorization
requirements.
B. Differentiated pathway authorization thresholds for rural LEAs.
(1) Notwithstanding R.S. 17:189.9 and R.S. 17:189.13, a rural local
education agency classified under Subsection A of this Section shall be subject
to differentiated thresholds established by the collaborative.
(2) A rural local education agency whose Jump Start pathway has been
authorized under this Section shall submit to the collaborative an annual rural
pathway progress report not later than December first of each year, covering
the immediately preceding academic year and containing:
(a) Current enrollment in the authorized pathway, disaggregated by
grade level.
(b) The current status of all employer partnerships, including new
Page 57 of 83
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-2719 ENGROSSED
SB NO. 524
employer partnerships established during the reporting year and any employer
partnerships discontinued.
(c) The tier level of work-based learning placements provided to enrolled
students during the reporting year, and documentation of progress toward the
WBL minimum tier level required by R.S. 17:189.11, where a Work-Based
Learning Development Plan is in effect.
(d) Any material changes to pathway delivery that may affect compliance
with the pathway authorization conditions of R.S. 17:189.13.
(e) Any transportation challenges experienced during the reporting year
and steps the local education agency has taken or plans to take to address them,
consistent with the transportation access plan required under Subsection D of
this Section.
C. Consortium pathway authorization; small districts.
(1) Two or more rural local education agencies classified under
Subsection A of this Section may jointly submit a Jump Start pathway
authorization proposal as a consortium. A consortium established under this
Subsection shall be treated as a single proposing party for purposes of the R.S.
17:189.13 pathway authorization process.
(2) A consortium Jump Start pathway proposal shall include, in addition
to all elements required under R.S. 17:189.13, the following:
(a) The identity of each participating rural local education agency and
the designation of one participating local education agency as lead, which shall
serve as the primary administrative party responsible for all communications
with the collaborative, for enrollment coordination across participating local
education agencies.
(b) A signed consortium agreement executed by the authorized
representative of each participating local education agency, specifying:
(i) The responsibilities of each participating local education agency for
curriculum delivery, instructor staffing, work-based learning coordination,
Page 58 of 83
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-2719 ENGROSSED
SB NO. 524
credentialing support, and student advising and ICAP services under R.S.
17:189.7 and R.S. 17:189.8.
(ii) The site or sites at which Jump Start pathway instruction will be
delivered, and the transportation arrangements each participating local
education agency will use to ensure enrolled students have access to each
delivery site, consistent with the requirements of Subsection D of this Section.
(iii) A plan for shared allocation of pathway enrollment capacity among
participating local education agencies, including enrollment targets and
procedures for addressing over- or under-enrollment at any participating local
education agency.
(iv) The process for admitting additional rural LEAs to the consortium,
consistent with Paragraph (5) of this Subsection.
(v) Dispute resolution procedures for inter-LEA disagreements arising
from the consortium's delivery of the authorized pathway.
(c) Documentation of the combined total K-12 student enrollment of all
participating local education agencies, which shall constitute the enrollment
basis for all collaborative assessments of pathway viability for the consortium.
(d) Where applicable, documentation of any existing partnering
arrangements under R.S. 17:189.9 on which the consortium intends to rely for
pathway delivery, together with a description of how those arrangements are
incorporated into the consortium's delivery model.
(3) For purposes of Jump Start pathway authorization, reauthorization,
and all related assessments under R.S. 17:189.13, the combined student
enrollment of all participating local education agencies shall be aggregated and
treated as a single local education agency enrollment figure. The employer-
demand documentation thresholds applicable under Subsection B of this Section
shall apply to the consortium as a whole.
(4) The lead LEA is primarily responsible for compliance with R.S.
17:189.13 authorization conditions.
Page 59 of 83
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-2719 ENGROSSED
SB NO. 524
(5) A local education agency that is not classified as a rural local
education agency under Subsection A of this Section but operates in a
geographic area contiguous to the service area of one or more participating
rural local education agencies in a consortium may petition the collaborative for
inclusion in the consortium upon demonstrating that the local education agency
faces documented access barriers comparable to those qualifying rural local
education agencies. The collaborative may approve inclusion upon a written
finding that the applying local education agency's participation would
strengthen the consortium's ability to deliver a pathway consistent with the
standards of this Subpart and that inclusion does not circumvent the rural
access purpose of this Section.
D. Transportation support requirements.
(1) A local education agency delivering a Jump Start pathway at a site
outside enrolled students' school of attendance, whether independently or
through a consortium, shall ensure enrolled students have meaningful access to
transportation to and from the instructional site. Transportation provided
under this Section shall comply with all applicable Louisiana laws governing the
transportation of public school students.
(2) Each rural LEA that delivers, or proposes to deliver, a pathway at a
shared or off-campus site shall include in its pathway authorization proposal,
under R.S. 17:189.13, a Transportation Access Plan specifying:
(a) Each delivery site at which pathway instruction will be conducted and
the estimated distance from the home school of each participating local
education agency's students.
(b) The estimated number of students for whom transportation will be
necessary.
(c) The mechanism or mechanisms through which the local education
agency will provide or facilitate student access to each instruction site, which
may include:
Page 60 of 83
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-2719 ENGROSSED
SB NO. 524
(i) Physical arrangements including school bus and third-party shuttle
bus.
(ii) Technology-aided or hybrid instruction arrangements, consistent
with R.S. 17:189.18, to supplement in-person delivery for pathway components
that can be effectively delivered remotely, thereby reducing required student
travel.
(d) The estimated annual cost of the transportation access mechanism
identified under Subparagraph (c) of this Paragraph and the available funding
source or sources from which those costs will be funded.
(e) A written assurance that no enrolled student will be denied access to
the Jump Start pathway solely because of the student's inability to arrange
transportation to the instructional site.
(3) The failure of a rural local education agency to submit and maintain
its Transportation Access Plan required under Paragraph (2) of this Subsection,
or to implement the plan in a manner that ensures enrolled students are not
denied access to the Jump Start pathway, shall constitute a failure to maintain
pathway authorization conditions under R.S. 17:189.13.
E. Rural access monitoring.
(1) The collaborative shall monitor and publicly report on rural local
education agencies access to authorized Jump Start pathways as provided in
this Subsection, in coordination with its annual reporting obligations under R.S.
17:189.3 and the data requirements of R.S. 17:189.18.
(2) Nothing in this Section shall require a rural local education agency
to offer any specific Jump Start pathway or limit its authority to determine,
consistent with local governance responsibilities and the pathway authorization
requirements of this Subpart, which pathways, if any, to propose for
authorization.
§189.15. Postsecondary articulation and transfer credit agreements
A. Articulation agreement; condition of Jump Start pathway
Page 61 of 83
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-2719 ENGROSSED
SB NO. 524
authorization.
(1) As a condition of Jump Start pathway authorization under R.S.
17:189.13, each local education agency shall maintain at least one postsecondary
articulation agreement with at least one Louisiana public postsecondary
institution, with priority given to community and technical colleges. The
agreement shall be submitted as evidence of compliance in the Jump Start
pathway authorization proposal under R.S. 17:189.13. If an executed agreement
is not in place at the time of proposal submission, the local education agency
shall submit a compliance timeline under Subsection D of this Section.
(2) A postsecondary articulation agreement required under this
Subsection shall:
(a) Be signed by authorized representatives of all parties.
(b) Specify the Jump Start pathway or pathways to which the agreement
applies and the academic year from which the credit transfer terms are
effective.
(c) Set forth minimum credit transfer terms for qualifying Jump Start
pathway completers accepted at the institution, consistent with Subsection B of
this Section.
(d) Specify an effective period of not fewer than five years or the
pathway's authorization period under R.S. 17:189.13, whichever is longer,
subject to annual review under Subsection F of this Section.
(e) Include a process for resolving disputes between a qualifying student,
the local education agency, and the contracting institution regarding a student's
eligibility for credit transfer.
(3) A local education agency's failure to maintain an active
postsecondary articulation agreement satisfying the requirements of this Section
shall constitute a failure to maintain a Jump Start pathway in good standing
and shall trigger the mid-cycle review process under R.S. 17:189.13.
B. Minimum agreement terms; credit transfer standards.
Page 62 of 83
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-2719 ENGROSSED
SB NO. 524
(1) A postsecondary articulation agreement required under Subsection
A of this Section shall, at a minimum, provide all of the following:
(a) A defined transfer pathway entitling students to postsecondary course
credit or equivalency recognition at the contracting postsecondary institution
in an aligned subject area.
(b) A minimum transfer value of three postsecondary credit hours, or
one postsecondary course equivalent, in the relevant subject area or
occupational domain, applied toward the student's program upon enrollment.
(c) The pathway completion requirements for credit transfer eligibility,
including completion of the approved nine-credit Jump Start course sequence
under R.S. 17:189.10, attainment of the required credential under R.S.
17:189.12, or both; eligibility conditions shall not conflict with R.S. 17:189.5.
(d) The procedure by which an eligible student shall document pathway
completion and request credit transfer evaluation by the contracting
postsecondary institution.
(e) An annual review process consistent with Subsection F of this Section.
(2) An articulation agreement required under this Section shall not:
(a) Condition credit transfer eligibility solely on a student's enrollment
in a specific program of study at the contracting postsecondary institution,
except to the extent the transferred credit is applicable only within a defined
postsecondary program aligned to the pathway.
(b) Require a student to repeat or retake coursework that is substantially
equivalent in content to the Jump Start pathway coursework for which the
credit transfer is sought.
(c) Include terms that, in practical effect, render credit transfer
inaccessible.
(3) Nothing in this Section prevents a postsecondary articulation
agreement from providing credit transfer terms more favorable than the
minimums required by Paragraph (1) of this Subsection, including stacked
Page 63 of 83
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-2719 ENGROSSED
SB NO. 524
credit applicable to multiple postsecondary programs, advanced-standing
placement, or equivalencies exceeding Subparagraph (1)(b) of this Subsection.
C. Board of Regents coordination; common course numbering
framework.
(1) The Board of Regents, in coordination with the collaborative, shall
develop a common course numbering framework for Jump Start pathway
courses that facilitates consistent transfer credit evaluation by Louisiana public
postsecondary institutions. The framework shall:
(a) Assign to each authorized Jump Start pathway, or to defined clusters
of pathway course sequences, a standardized course identifier that Louisiana
public postsecondary education institutions may use to assess transfer credit
eligibility consistent with their institutional articulation policies and with the
minimum agreement terms required by Subsection B of this Section.
(b) Be organized by career cluster and industry sector, consistent with
the Statewide Priority Industry List established under R.S. 17:189.4, and
updated to reflect additions to and removals from the Priority Industry List as
part of each Biennial Priority Review under R.S. 17:189.4.
(c) Serve as a shared reference system for all articulation agreements
executed under this Section and for the statewide articulation framework
developed under Paragraph (2) of this Subsection.
(2) The Board of Regents shall, not later than two years after the
effective date of this Subpart and in coordination with the Louisiana Jump Start
Collaborative, develop and publish a statewide articulation framework
establishing minimum transfer credit terms applicable to all Louisiana public
postsecondary education institutions for Jump Start pathway course sequences
identified in the common course numbering framework under Paragraph (1)
of this Subsection. The statewide articulation framework shall:
(a) Establish minimum credit transfer terms applicable to completers of
authorized Jump Start pathways aligned to each industry sector on the
Page 64 of 83
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-2719 ENGROSSED
SB NO. 524
Statewide Priority Industry List.
(b) Identify the postsecondary degree programs, technical certificate
programs, and workforce certificate programs to which Jump Start pathway
course credit may be applied, consistent with the Board of Regents' program
approval and articulation authority under R.S. 17:3138 et seq.
(c) Be reviewed and updated by the Board of Regents, in coordination
with the collaborative, not less frequently than once every three academic years,
to reflect updates to the common course numbering framework and any
changes to the Statewide Priority Industry List.
D. Statutory timeline for establishment of articulation agreement.
(1) For Jump Start pathway proposals seeking initial authorization
under R.S. 17:189.13, the following requirements govern submission of the
articulation agreement:
(a) A proposal that has an executed postsecondary articulation
agreement meeting Subsection B of this Section at the time of proposal
submission under R.S. 17:189.13 shall submit the agreement with the
authorization proposal.
(b) A proposal that does not yet have a fully executed postsecondary
articulation agreement at the time of proposal submission shall, in lieu of an
executed agreement, submit a documented compliance timeline as part of the
proposal specifying:
(i) The name of each Louisiana public postsecondary institution with
which the local education agency has been or is actively engaged in negotiations
toward execution of an articulation agreement.
(ii) The credit transfer terms tentatively agreed upon or under active
discussion, to the extent determinable.
(iii) A date by which a fully executed articulation agreement will be
submitted to the Louisiana Jump Start Collaborative, which shall not be later
than eighteen months following the date on which the Jump Start pathway is
Page 65 of 83
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-2719 ENGROSSED
SB NO. 524
authorized.
(2) An authorized Jump Start pathway operating under an approved
compliance timeline under Paragraph (1) of this Subsection shall not be subject
to R.S. 17:189.13 authorization condition failure solely because no agreement
has yet been executed, provided the local education agency is actively pursuing
execution of the postsecondary articulation agreement and submits an
agreement to the collaborative by the timeline's specified date.
(3) A Jump Start pathway shall not receive reauthorization under R.S.
17:189.13, and shall not be approved or maintained at Tier 2 or Tier 3 pathway
designation under R.S. 17:189.9, unless a fully executed articulation agreement
is in place at the time of the pathway's reauthorization review.
E. Compliance mechanism; consequences of noncompliance.
(1) An authorized Jump Start pathway whose articulation agreement
expires or is terminated without simultaneous execution of a replacement
agreement shall undergo a mid-cycle review by the collaborative, or its
designee, under R.S. 17:189.13.
(2) An authorized Jump Start pathway that fails to maintain an active
articulation agreement for a continuous period exceeding twenty-four months
or without an approved compliance plan shall be subject to pathway suspension
under R.S. 17:189.13 until a compliant agreement is executed and submitted to
the collaborative.
(3) Nothing in this Section requires deauthorization of a Jump Start
pathway solely because a postsecondary institution failed to execute or maintain
a required agreement, where the local education agency has documented good-
faith efforts with at least two Louisiana public postsecondary institutions and
demonstrated that no geographically accessible institution has agreed. In such
circumstances, the collaborative may continue the pathway authorization with
a written finding of institutional noncooperation, reported to the Board of
Regents and legislature under this Section.
Page 66 of 83
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-2719 ENGROSSED
SB NO. 524
F. Annual review and update of articulation agreements.
(1) Each postsecondary articulation agreement required under this
Section shall include a provision for annual review by all parties by June first
of each year to assess whether the agreement accurately reflects the pathway's
current curriculum, credentials, and postsecondary program alignments, and
whether modifications are needed to maintain compliance with Subsection B of
this Section.
(2) A local education agency operating an authorized pathway shall
notify the collaborative within thirty calendar days of any of the following
events:
(a) Execution of a new articulation agreement or renewal of an existing
agreement covering the authorized pathway.
(b) A material modification to the credit transfer terms of an existing
articulation agreement.
(c) Expiration of an articulation agreement without simultaneous
execution of a renewal or replacement agreement.
(d) Termination or cancellation of an existing articulation agreement
prior to its stated expiration date.
§189.16. Access to Jump Start pathways; partnering authority
A. All public high schools; access obligation.
(1) Each local education agency operating a public high school shall
provide each enrolled student access to career and technical education courses,
including authorized Jump Start pathways offered pursuant to this Subpart.
(2) Such access obligation includes:
(a) Ensure that at least one authorized Jump Start pathway is available
to students enrolled in grades nine through twelve in each public high school
operated by the local education agency, except as provided in Subsection C of
this Section.
(b) Inform enrolled students and their parents or legal guardians of
Page 67 of 83
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-2719 ENGROSSED
SB NO. 524
available Jump Start pathway options during ICAP development, review, and
revision as required under R.S. 17:189.7.
(c) Ensure that the full nine-credit Jump Start course sequence required
for Career Diploma completion under R.S. 17:189.10 is accessible to students
enrolled in an authorized Jump Start pathway, either through direct course
delivery by the local education agency or through a partnering agreement
established under Subsection B of this Section.
(3) Nothing in this Section shall be construed to require a local education
agency to offer a Jump Start pathway in an industry sector not included on the
Statewide Priority Industry List or applicable Regional Priority Industry List
maintained pursuant to R.S. 17:189.4.
B. Partnering authority; agreements with other schools and institutions.
(1) If a local education agency cannot directly provide career and
technical education courses or an authorized Jump Start pathway, the local
education agency may enter into a written partnering agreement with one or
more of the following entities to provide such courses or pathway access to its
enrolled students:
(a) A separate local education agency in the state.
(b) A Louisiana public community or technical college.
(c) A nonprofit proprietary school approved by the State Board of
Elementary and Secondary Education.
(d) A Course Choice provider approved by the State Board of
Elementary and Secondary Education, consistent with R.S. 17:4002.1 et seq.
(2) A partnering agreement entered into under this Subsection shall:
(a) Be in writing and executed by authorized representatives of all
parties.
(b) Specify the career and technical education courses or Jump Start
pathways to which the agreement applies and the terms under which enrolled
students will access the agreed instruction.
Page 68 of 83
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-2719 ENGROSSED
SB NO. 524
(c) Address liability, transportation responsibilities, and any cost-sharing
arrangements between the parties.
(d) Be submitted to the collaborative as part of any Jump Start pathway
authorization proposal or reauthorization proposal under R.S. 17:189.13.
(3) A partnering agreement under this Subsection may support the
delivery of one or more components of an authorized Jump Start pathway, but
it shall not substitute for the local education agency's obligation to ensure that
enrolled students receive all required academic core courses, individual career
planning, and counseling services consistent with R.S. 17:189.8 and R.S.
17:189.10.
(4) When a local education agency enters into an arrangement to share
facilities, materials, equipment, or instructors with a Louisiana public
community or technical college:
(a) The local education agency shall be responsible for the cost of
transporting such students to the partnering institution.
(b) Other expenses and issues, including liability, involved in sharing
resources shall be the responsibility of the local education agency.
(5) A regional team formed pursuant to R.S. 17:189.9 shall coordinate
Jump Start pathway and course delivery across local education agency
boundaries and may establish cross-district enrollment agreements and
program-sharing arrangements consistent with R.S. 17:189.9 to support the
goals of this Section.
(6) For rural local education agencies classified under R.S. 17:189.14, the
partnering authority provided by this Subsection is subject to the provisions of
R.S. 17:189.14, including consortium pathway arrangements available to
multiple rural local education agencies under R.S. 17:189.14.
C. Mission-based waiver; the State Board of Elementary and Secondary
Education authority.
(1) If the approved mission or curriculum model of a public high school
Page 69 of 83
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-2719 ENGROSSED
SB NO. 524
does not align with providing career and technical education courses or an
authorized Jump Start pathway, the governing authority of the school may
request a waiver from the State Board of Elementary and Secondary Education
of the access obligation established in Subsection A of this Section. Nothing in
this Section shall be interpreted to supersede R.S. 17:4002.1 et seq.
(2) A waiver request submitted under Paragraph (1) of this Subsection
shall:
(a) Describe the school's approved mission or curriculum model and the
basis on which it does not align with providing career and technical education
courses or authorized Jump Start pathways.
(b) Identify any alternative means through which students enrolled at the
waiver-requesting school may access career and technical education courses
consistent with Subsection A of this Section, including through partnering
agreements under Subsection B of this Section.
(3) A waiver granted under this Subsection shall be reviewed by the State
Board of Elementary and Secondary Education not less frequently than once
every five years to assess whether the mission or curriculum basis for the waiver
remains valid.
§189.17. Program delivery methods; instructor qualifications and professional
development
A. Methods of program development and curriculum design options.
(1) To develop and implement a Career Major Program, a local
education agency may use any of the following program development methods:
(a) System-wide development, in which the local education agency
develops a uniform career major program across all schools under the agency's
jurisdiction.
(b) Consortium development, in which the local education agency
collaborates with one or more other local education agencies or a regional team
formed pursuant to R.S. 17:189.9 to jointly develop and deliver a Career Major
Page 70 of 83
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-2719 ENGROSSED
SB NO. 524
Program.
(2) The following curriculum design options are available for authorized
Career Major Programs:
(a) Block scheduling arrangements that allow a student to accumulate
Carnegie units in alignment with the nine-credit Jump Start course sequence
established in R.S. 17:189.10.
(b) Coordination of available elective credits into a coherent, sequenced
Career Major Program aligned with an authorized pathway.
(c) State Board of Elementary and Secondary Education-approved new
courses developed to meet the requirements of an authorized Jump Start
pathway.
(d) Sharing of facilities, materials, equipment, and instructors with
community and technical colleges consistent with R.S. 17:189.17.
(e) Organization and sequencing of new courses in accordance with the
appropriate Statewide Priority Industry List or Regional Priority List
established under R.S. 17:189.4.
(f) Arrangements for students to complete work-based learning activities
consistent with the work-based learning quality standards and tiered
requirements established in R.S. 17:189.11.
(3) Each local education agency shall submit proposed Career Major
Programs to the State Board of Elementary and Secondary Education for
approval in accordance with R.S. 17:189.10.
B. Career and technical instructor qualifications.
(1) An instructor assigned to teach a career and technical education
course within an authorized Jump Start pathway shall meet at least one of the
following qualification standards:
(a) Hold a valid teaching certificate issued in accordance with state
standards for certification of school personnel, in the applicable career and
technical education subject area.
Page 71 of 83
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-2719 ENGROSSED
SB NO. 524
(b) Be in compliance with the reciprocal instructor certification policy
established by the State Board of Elementary and Secondary Education for
instructors who reside in other states but are employed by authorized providers
and satisfy applicable state certification requirements pursuant to state law.
(2) In addition to Paragraph (1) of this Subsection, the state Department
of Education, in consultation with the collaborative, shall, in coordination with
the State Board of Elementary and Secondary Education, establish or affirm
minimum industry-experience standards for instructors assigned to career and
technical education courses in Jump Start pathways aligned to priority
occupations under R.S. 17:189.4. Such standards shall:
(a) Require, at a minimum, that instructors assigned to designated Jump
Start pathway career and technical education courses hold, or demonstrate the
ability to obtain, the industry-based credentials required for student completion
of the applicable pathway under R.S. 17:189.12.
(b) Recognize demonstrated industry experience in the relevant career
field as a qualification pathway for alternative certification or provisional
authorization, consistent with alternative certification procedures established
by the State Board of Elementary and Secondary Education.
(c) Be established not later than one hundred eighty calendar days
following the effective date of this Subpart and updated as necessary to reflect
changes in priority occupation requirements and industry-based credential
standards.
(4) A local education agency unable to identify a qualified instructor
under Paragraph (1) or (2) of this Subsection for a specific career and technical
education course within an authorized Jump Start pathway may, upon written
acknowledgment from the state Department of Education:
(a) Contract with an approved postsecondary institution, community
college, technical college, or other provider authorized under R.S. 17:189.17 to
deliver the affected course through a formal instructional partnership
Page 72 of 83
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-2719 ENGROSSED
SB NO. 524
agreement.
(b) Deliver the affected course through technology-aided instruction
consistent with Subsection D of this Section.
C. Staff development and professional development standards.
(1) Each instructor assigned to teach a career and technical education
course within an authorized Jump Start pathway shall receive staff
development and in-service training addressing both the technical content of the
applicable career field and effective instructional strategies for career and
technical education course delivery, aligned with the Career Major Program
requirements.
(2) Any instructor assigned to teach a career and technical education
course who was not previously certified or trained in the applicable content area
shall receive appropriate staff development and in-service training before
assuming sole instructional responsibility for the course, or shall be supervised
by a qualified instructor until such training is completed.
(3) Local education agencies shall document professional development
activities completed by each instructor assigned to a career and technical
education course within an authorized pathway and shall make such records
available upon request as part of Jump Start pathway oversight under R.S.
17:189.3.
D. Alternative delivery; technology-aided instruction.
(1) An authorized Jump Start pathway course may be delivered through
technology-aided instruction, including virtual, online, or blended delivery
methods, in any of the following circumstances:
(a) A qualified instructor meeting the standards of Subsection B of this
Section is unavailable to provide direct instruction for the course.
(b) The local education agency determines that technology-aided
instruction represents the most practicable means of providing pathway access
to students in rural or geographically remote locations, consistent with the rural
Page 73 of 83
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-2719 ENGROSSED
SB NO. 524
access provisions of R.S. 17:189.14.
(c) Technology-aided instruction supplements and supports classroom
instruction, including through digital learning tools, simulations, or virtual
work-based learning components endorsed by the applicable regional team and
consistent with the work-based learning standards of R.S. 17:189.11.
(2) Technology-aided instruction alone shall not substitute for the work-
based learning experiences required under R.S. 17:189.11. For Jump Start
pathways delivered primarily or substantially through technology-aided
instruction, local education agencies shall maintain active employer
partnerships under R.S. 17:189.11 to ensure that students have access to
required work-based learning experiences at the minimum tier level required
by R.S. 17:189.11.
§189.18. Data collection; reporting; transparency
A. Annual public Jump Start data report; mandate and publication
deadline.
(1) The collaborative shall publish annually a comprehensive public
report hereby established as the "Jump Start Annual Data Report". The report
shall be publicly available not later than March first of each year, covering data
from the prior academic year.
(2) The collaborative shall transmit the Jump Start Annual Data Report
to each of the following recipients not later than the publication deadline
established in Paragraph (1) of this Subsection:
(a) The State Board of Elementary and Secondary Education.
(b) The chair of the House Committee on Education and the chair of the
Senate Committee on Education of the Louisiana Legislature.
(c) The governor.
(d) Member agencies of the collaborative.
(3) Each Jump Start Annual Data Report shall be published in a format
and at a level of detail sufficient to allow members of the public and
Page 74 of 83
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-2719 ENGROSSED
SB NO. 524
policymakers to assess the performance, quality, and workforce alignment of
Jump Start at the statewide, regional pathway, and local education agency
levels.
B. Required data elements.
(1) Each Jump Start Annual Data Report shall include, at a minimum,
all of the following data elements and all pathway-level performance metrics
reported under this Subsection shall use the standardized metrics established
and updated by the collaborative pursuant to R.S. 17:189.3, ensuring
consistency between the internal shared performance framework and the public
report:
(a) The number of career and technical education concentrators, as
defined in R.S. 17:189.2, enrolled in each authorized Jump Start pathway,
disaggregated by pathway, industry sector, workforce development region,
student subgroup, and grade level.
(b) The number of career and technical education completers, as defined
in R.S. 17:189.2, including both those who earned a Career Diploma under R.S.
17:189.5 and those who completed all Jump Start pathway requirements
without electing a Career Diploma, disaggregated by pathway, industry sector,
workforce development region, student subgroup, and grade level.
(c) Credential attainment rates, including the percentage of career and
technical education concentrators and career and technical education
completers who earned at least one credential, disaggregated by Jump Start
pathway, credential name, credential tier as established under R.S. 17:189.12,
student subgroup, and grade level.
(d) Work-based learning participation rates, including the percentage
of career and technical education concentrators and career and technical
education completers participating in work-based learning activities and the
tier of participation consistent with the tiered work-based learning
requirements of R.S. 17:189.11 disaggregated by Jump Start pathway, industry
Page 75 of 83
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-2719 ENGROSSED
SB NO. 524
sector, workforce development region, student subgroup, and grade level.
(e) Early postsecondary credit participation rates, including dual
enrollment participation rates, and articulated credit participation rates, each
reported by Jump Start pathway, consistent with the postsecondary articulation
framework of R.S. 17:189.15 disaggregated by Jump Start pathway, course,
workforce development region, student subgroup, and grade level.
(f) Post-graduation transitions and outcomes measured using enhanced
wage record data described under Subsection E of this Section and collected at
the intervals specified in Subsection D of this Section:
(i) Postsecondary enrollment rates for Career Diploma graduates within
four quarters of graduation, disaggregated by type of postsecondary institution
enrolled program and student subgroup.
(ii) Employment rates and median wages for Career Diploma graduates
within four quarters of graduation disaggregated by industry sector or
occupation and by subgroup.
(iii) Employment rates and median wages for Career Diploma graduates
at the second quarter after graduation disaggregated by industry sector or
occupation and by subgroup.
(g) A summary of career and technical education instructors,
disaggregated by local education agency, pathway, and workforce development
region, as required under R.S. 17:189.18.
(2) Nothing in this Subsection shall be construed to prevent the
collaborative from including additional data elements in the Jump Start Annual
Data Report beyond the minimum floor established in Paragraph (1) of this
Subsection, provided that all additional elements are consistent with the privacy
protections established in Subsection G of this Section.
C. Student subgroup disaggregation; statutory obligation.
(1) All data elements reported in the Jump Start Annual Data Report
under Subsection B of this Section shall be disaggregated, to the extent data are
Page 76 of 83
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-2719 ENGROSSED
SB NO. 524
available and the aggregate reporting thresholds established in Subsection G of
this Section permit, by all of the following student subgroup categories:
(a) Race or ethnicity.
(b) Gender.
(c) Economic disadvantage status.
(d) Rural or urban geographic classification of the student's enrolled
school, using the rural local education agency designation criteria established
in R.S. 17:189.14.
(e) Disability status, including students with disabilities receiving services
under an Individualized Education Program (IEP) pursuant to the Individuals
with Disabilities Education Act, 20 U.S.C. 1400 et seq.
(f) English learner status.
(2) The student disaggregation requirement established in this
Subsection is a standalone statutory obligation applicable to the Jump Start
Annual Data Report published under Subsection A of this Section. This
obligation is independent of, and supplementary to, any disaggregation
requirements applicable to the shared performance framework under R.S.
17:189.3.
D. Cross-agency data sharing agreement
(1) As put forth in R.S. 17:189.3, agency members of the Louisiana Jump
Start collaborative shall enter into a written, formal Memorandum of
Understanding that includes cross-agency data sharing for the purpose of
shared performance framework and the transmission of the Jump Start Annual
Data Report.
(2) Nothing in this Subsection shall be construed to require the sharing
of individually identifiable student data with the public. All data made publicly
available in the Jump Start Annual Data Report shall be subject to the
aggregate reporting thresholds and privacy protections established in
Subsection G of this Section.
Page 77 of 83
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-2719 ENGROSSED
SB NO. 524
E. Privacy protections; aggregate reporting requirements.
(1) All data published in the Jump Start Annual Data Report shall be
presented in aggregate form only. No individually identifiable student data shall
be disclosed in any public report published under this Section.
(2) For purposes of disaggregation required by Subsection C of this
Section and any other disaggregated data element included in the Jump Start
Annual Data Report, the collaborative shall apply aggregate reporting
thresholds to prevent the identification of individual students from publicly
reported data.
(3) The data privacy protections established in this Subsection shall be
consistent with and no less protective than the requirements of the Family
Educational Rights and Privacy Act, 20 U.S.C. 1232g (FERPA), and any
applicable Louisiana statutes governing the privacy of student records.
(4) Enhanced wage record data shall be subject to the confidentiality
protections applicable to Louisiana Works wage records under Title 23 of the
Louisiana Revised Statutes of 1950 and shall not be used for any purpose other
than the production of the aggregate outcome data required by this Section.
§189.19. Applicability
The requirements of this Subpart shall not apply to any of the following:
(1) Any student who, as of the effective date of this Subpart, is enrolled
in a Career Major Program under the provisions of R.S. 17:183.1 through R.S.
17:183.5 as they existed prior to enactment of this Act shall be entitled to
complete that program and earn a Career Diploma under the requirements
applicable at the time of the student's initial enrollment in the career major
program.
(2) Each Jump Start pathway, Career Major Program, or credential-
bearing program that was authorized by the State Board of Elementary and
Secondary Education under R.S. 17:183.1 through R.S. 17:183.5 as of the
effective date of this Subpart shall continue in effect for a transitional period of
Page 78 of 83
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-2719 ENGROSSED
SB NO. 524
not less than eighteen months following the effective date of this Subpart.
(3) An Individual Graduation Plan established for a student under R.S.
17:2925 prior to the effective date of this Subpart shall remain in effect and
shall be honored for purposes of that student's graduation requirements,
subject to the student's rights under Paragraph (1) of this Subsection. Nothing
in this Subpart shall require a student to revise a prior Individual Graduation
Plan solely as a result of the enactment of this Act.
(4) No credential earned by a student under the provisions of R.S.
17:183.1 through R.S. 17:183.5 prior to the effective date of this Subpart shall
be invalidated, reclassified downward, or reduced in value for purposes of that
student's diploma requirements solely by reason of the enactment of this Act or
the credential tier framework established in R.S. 17:189.12.
§189.20. Severability clause
If any provision or item of this Act, or the application thereof, is held
invalid, such invalidity shall not affect other provisions, items, or applications
of the Act which can be given effect without the invalid provision, item, or
application and to this end the provisions of this Act are hereby declared
severable.
Section 2. R.S. 17:183.1 through 183.5 are hereby repealed.
Section 3. The provisions of this Act shall be implemented in Phases as outlined:
Phase I: Shall be known as the "Foundation Phase" which shall take effect not later than
ninety calendar days following the effective date of this Act; and under this Phase the
Louisiana Workforce Investment Council within Louisiana Works shall establish the
administrative and staff support infrastructure required to support the collaborative
operations. Phase II: Shall be known as the "Initial Operational Readiness Phase" which
shall take effect not later than one hundred eighty calendar days following the effective date
of this Act; and under this Phase the Louisiana Jump Start collaborative shall hold its
organizational meeting and adopt operating procedures; the collaborative shall establish the
initial Statewide Priority Industry List; the agency members of the collaborative shall
Page 79 of 83
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-2719 ENGROSSED
SB NO. 524
execute the Memorandum of Understanding (MOU); and the State Board of Elementary and
Secondary Education and the state Department of Education shall publish the initial
approved career coaching vendor list. Phase III: Shall be known as the "Pathway
Authorization Cycle Phase" which shall take effect not later than one year following the
effective date of this Act; and under this phase the collaborative shall begin accepting
pathway authorization proposals and each local education agency shall initiate the ICAP
process for incoming seventh grade students beginning with the first academic year
commencing after the effective date of this Act. Phase IV: Shall be known as the "Full
Program Architecture Implementation Phase" which shall take effect not later than two years
following the effective date of this Act; under this Phase the Board of Regents shall, in
coordination with the collaborative, develop and publish the statewide articulation
framework establishing minimum transfer credit terms; the collaborative shall complete the
initial tier designation review for all Jump Start pathways authorized under the new
framework; and regional teams shall submit updated Regional Priority Industry Lists
following the collaborative's completion of the first Biennial Priority Review. Phase V: Shall
be known as the "Steady-State Operation Phase" which shall take effect by the beginning of
the fourth academic year following the effective date of this Act; under this Phase all
authorized Jump Start pathways shall have been reviewed by the collaborative and shall have
received a tier designation; the first cohort of students with ICAPs shall be completing their
high school careers under the four-stage framework; and the annual Jump Start Data Report
shall have been published for the third consecutive year.